M ARINE M AMMAL C OMMISSION Annual Report to Congress 2001 Marine Mammal Commission 4340 East-West Highway, Room 905 Bethesda, Maryland 20814 31 March 2002 Contents List of Tables ............................................................... iii List of Figures ............................................................... iv I. Introduction ...........................................................
1 Personnel ........................................................1 Funding .........................................................1 Reauthorization of the Marine Mammal Protection Act .......................3 Background ......................................................3 Activities in 2001 ..................................................4 Species of Special Concern ...............................................9 North Atlantic Right Whale ..........................................9 North Pacific Right Whale ..........................................27 Humpback Whales in Alaska ........................................30 Gray Whale .....................................................34 Killer Whales in the Eastern North Pacific .............................39 Gulf of Maine Harbor Porpoise ......................................43 Bottlenose Dolphins along the Atlantic and Gulf of Mexico Coasts ..........49 Cook Inlet Beluga Whale ...........................................55 Hawaiian Monk Seal ..............................................63 Steller Sea Lion ..................................................77 Pacific Walrus ...................................................89 Harbor Seals in Alaska ............................................95 Polar Bear .....................................................100 Sea Otter ......................................................108 Florida Manatee .................................................114 Dugongs in Okinawa .............................................129 Marine Mammal/Fisheries Interactions ..................................131 Implementation of the Incidental-Take Regime for Commercial Fisheries ....................................131 The Tuna-Dolphin Issue ..........................................141 International Aspects of Marine Mammal Protection and Conservation .........................................................155 The Compendium of Treaties and International Agreements ..............155 International Whaling Commission ..................................156 The Arctic Council ...............................................160 Convention on International Trade in Endangered Species of Wild Fauna and Flora ....................................162 II.
III.
IV.
V. VI. Marine Mammal Mortality Events ......................................167 Unusual Mortality Events in 2001 ...................................168 Working Group on Marine Mammal Unusual Mortality Events ............170 Marine Mammal Rescue Assistance Act of 2000 .......................171 Effects of Sound on Marine Mammals ...................................1 Proposed Operational Deployment of the SURTASS LFA Sonar ..........1 The Bahamas Cetacean Strandings ..................................1 The Littoral Warfare Advanced Development (LWAD) Program ..........1 7 7 7 7 7 7 7 8 8 3 4 6 8 9 9 9 0 5 VII.
VIII.
Research and Studies Program .........................................1 Survey of Federally Funded Marine Mammal Research ..................1 Workshops and Planning Meetings ..................................1 Commission-Sponsored Research and Study Projects ...................1 Assessment of Collisions between Ships and Whales ....................1 IX. Permits and Authorizations to Take Marine Mammals .....................189 Permit-Related Regulations ........................................189 Permit Application Review ........................................190 Small-Take Authorizations ........................................191 Interactions with Marine Mammals in the Wild ........................204 Marine Mammals in Captivity ..........................................207 Care and Maintenance Standards ....................................207 Swim-with-the-Dolphin Regulations .................................208 Exports of Marine Mammals to Foreign Facilities ......................208 Release of Captive Marine Mammals to the Wild .......................210 X. Appendix A: Marine Mammal Commission Recommendations in 2001 .............217 Appendix B: Reports of Commission-Sponsored Activities Available from the National Technical Information Service .........................227 Appendix C: Selected Literature Published Elsewhere Resulting from Commission-Sponsored Activities .................................235 Appendix D: Statement of the Marine Mammal Commission on Reauthorization of the Marine Mammal Protection Act, 11 October 2001 ..............247 iii List of Tables Table 1.
Marine mammals listed as endangered or threatened under the Endangered Species Act and depleted under the Marine Mammal Protection Act, as of 31 December 2001 ..............................................10 Estimates of harbor porpoise bycatch in sink gillnet fisheries in the Bay of Fundy (Canada), New England (U.S.), and off the U.S. mid-Atlantic states, 19902000 ........................................................45 Estimates of abundance for bottlenose dolphin stocks in the western North Atlantic and Gulf of Mexico ...........................................51 Counts of adult and juvenile (nonpup) Steller sea lions at U.S. rookery and haul-out trend sites by region, 19752000 ............................78 Estimates of Steller sea lions harvested and struck and lost in the annual subsistence harvest by Alaska Natives, 19922000 .........................80 Estimated catches of Pacific walruses in Alaska and reported catch of walruses in Russia, 19922000 ........................................92 Numbers of polar bears tagged during Alaska Native harvests, 19892001 .....103 Trends in sea otter counts in southwestern Alaska, 19862001 ...............110 California sea otter population counts, 19842001 ........................112 Known manatee mortality in the southeastern United States (excluding Puerto Rico) reported through the manatee salvage and necropsy program, 19782001 .......................................................115 Estimated incidental kill of dolphins in the tuna purse seine fishery in the eastern tropical Pacific Ocean, 19722001 .........................143 Proportion of recorded large whale deaths resulting or possibly resulting from ship collisions ................................................185 Table 2.
Table 3.
Table 4.
Table 5.
Table 6.
Table 7.
Table 8.
Table 9.
Table 10.
Table 11.
Table 12.
iv List of Figures Figure 1.
Figure 2.
Figure 3.
Figure 4.
Figure 5.
Figure 6.
Figure 7.
Figure 8.
Figure 9.
Designated critical habitats and mandatory ship reporting zones for North Atlantic right whales.
...........................................12 Known mortality of North Atlantic right whales: 1970-2001 .................13 Track of Churchill, an entangled North Atlantic right whale, between 9 June and 16 September 2001 .........................................14 Pole system used to inject tranquilizing drugs into Churchill .................15 Adult female right whale accompanied by calf shortly after being struck by a ship ................................................23 Time-area management zones under the Gulf of Maine Harbor Porpoise Take Reduction Plan .................................................44 The Hawaiian Archipelago ............................................64 Mean beach counts of Hawaiian monk seals at major breeding colonies; 1983-2001 .................................................65 Tern Island, French Frigate Shoals ......................................70 Figure 10.
Diver removing derelict trawl net from reefs in the Northwestern Hawaiian Islands ...................................................72 Figure 11.
Hawaiian monk seal on popular swimming beach on the Island of Kauai .......74 Figure 12.
Designated critical habitat for the western population of Steller sea lions.
......77 Figure 13.
Range of the Pacific walrus ...........................................90 Figure 14.
Female Alaska polar bear with cubs ....................................105 Figure 15.
Natural and artificial warm-water refuges with at least one count of 40 or more Florida manatees ............................................123 Figure 16.
Regional boundaries of Florida manatee subpopulations ....................126 Figure 17.
Number of severe and lethal large whale injuries by vessel speed ............186 v MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2000 Chapter I INTRODUCTION This is the 29th Annual Report of the Marine Mammal Commission, covering the period 1 January through 31 December 2001.
It is being submitted to Congress pursuant to section 204 of the Marine Mammal Protection Act of 1972.
Established under Title II of the Act, the Marine Mammal Commission is an independent agency of the Executive Branch.
It is charged with reviewing and making recommendations on domestic and international actions and policies of all federal agencies with respect to marine mammal protection and conservation and with carrying out a research program.
The purpose of this report is to provide timely information on management issues and events under purview of the Marine Mammal Commission in 2001.
The report is provided to Congress, federal and state agencies, public interest groups, the academic community, private citizens, and the international community.
When combined with past reports, it describes the evolution and progress of U.S. policies and programs to conserve marine mammals and their habitats.
To ensure accuracy, report drafts were reviewed by federal and state agencies and knowledgeable individuals.
Ph.D., Scientific Program Director; David W. Laist, Policy and Program Analyst; Michael L. Gosliner, General Counsel; Suzanne Montgomery, Special Assistant to the Executive Director; Jeannie K. Drevenak, Permit Officer; Jennifer L. Barnes, Policy Analyst on detail from the Department of State; Darel E. Jordan, Staff Assistant; and Cynthia M. Dickerson, Staff Assistant.
The Commission Chairman, with the concurrence of other Commissioners, appoints persons to the ninemember Committee of Scientific Advisors on Marine Mammals.
The Marine Mammal Protection Act requires that committee members be scientists who are knowledgeable in marine ecology and marine mammal affairs.
At the end of 2001 the committee members were Lloyd F. Lowry (Chairman), Fairbanks, Alaska; Daryl J. Boness, Ph.D., Smithsonian Institution, Washington, DC; Frances M. D. Gulland, Vet. M.B., Ph.D., The Marine Mammal Center, Sausalito, California; Steven K. Katona, Ph.D., College of the Atlantic, Bar Harbor, Maine; Galen B. Rathbun, Ph.D., Cambria, California; Stephen B. Reilly, Ph.D., National Marine Fisheries Service, La Jolla, California; Barbara L. Taylor, Ph.D., National Marine Fisheries Service, La Jolla, California; Peter L. Tyack, Ph.D., Woods Hole Oceanographic Institution, Woods Hole, Massachusetts; and Douglas Wartzok, Ph.D., Florida International University, Miami, Florida.
Marie Adams Carroll, Barrow, Alaska, serves as Special Advisor to the Marine Mammal Commission on Native Affairs.
Personnel The Commission consists of three members nominated by the President and confirmed by the Senate.
The Marine Mammal Protection Act requires that Commissioners be knowledgeable in marine ecology and resource management.
At the end of 2001 the Commissioners were John E. Reynolds, III, Ph.D. (Chairman), Eckerd College, St. Petersburg, Florida, and Mote Marine Laboratory, Sarasota, Florida; Paul K. Dayton, Ph.D., Scripps Institution of Oceanography, La Jolla, California; and Vera Alexander, Ph.D., University of Alaska, Fairbanks.
The Commission's staff includes Robert H. Mattlin, Ph.D., Executive Director; Timothy J. Ragen, vi Funding Appropriations to the Marine Mammal Commission in the past five fiscal years have been as follows: FY 1997, $1,189,000; FY 1998, $1,185,000; FY 1999, $1,240,000; FY 2000, $1,265,000; and FY 2001, $1,696,260 .
The Commission's appropriation for the current fiscal year, FY 2002, is $1,957,000.
vii Chapter I INTRODUCTION This is the 29th Annual Report of the Marine Mammal Commission, covering the period 1 January through 31 December 2001.
It is being submitted to Congress pursuant to section 204 of the Marine Mammal Protection Act of 1972.
Established under Title II of the Act, the Marine Mammal Commission is an independent agency of the Executive Branch.
It is charged with reviewing and making recommendations on domestic and international actions and policies of all federal agencies with respect to marine mammal protection and conservation and with carrying out a research program.
The purpose of this report is to provide timely information on management issues and events under purview of the Marine Mammal Commission in 2001.
The report is provided to Congress, federal and state agencies, public interest groups, the academic community, private citizens, and the international community.
When combined with past reports, it describes the evolution and progress of U.S. policies and programs to conserve marine mammals and their habitats.
To ensure accuracy, report drafts were reviewed by federal and state agencies and knowledgeable individuals.
Ph.D., Scientific Program Director; David W. Laist, Policy and Program Analyst; Michael L. Gosliner, General Counsel; Suzanne Montgomery, Special Assistant to the Executive Director; Jeannie K. Drevenak, Permit Officer; Jennifer L. Barnes, Policy Analyst on detail from the Department of State; Darel E. Jordan, Staff Assistant; and Cynthia M. Dickerson, Staff Assistant.
The Commission Chairman, with the concurrence of other Commissioners, appoints persons to the ninemember Committee of Scientific Advisors on Marine Mammals.
The Marine Mammal Protection Act requires that committee members be scientists who are knowledgeable in marine ecology and marine mammal affairs.
At the end of 2001 the committee members were Lloyd F. Lowry (Chairman), Fairbanks, Alaska; Daryl J. Boness, Ph.D., Smithsonian Institution, Washington, DC; Frances M. D. Gulland, Vet. M.B., Ph.D., The Marine Mammal Center, Sausalito, California; Steven K. Katona, Ph.D., College of the Atlantic, Bar Harbor, Maine; Galen B. Rathbun, Ph.D., Cambria, California; Stephen B. Reilly, Ph.D., National Marine Fisheries Service, La Jolla, California; Barbara L. Taylor, Ph.D., National Marine Fisheries Service, La Jolla, California; Peter L. Tyack, Ph.D., Woods Hole Oceanographic Institution, Woods Hole, Massachusetts; and Douglas Wartzok, Ph.D., Florida International University, Miami, Florida.
Marie Adams Carroll, Barrow, Alaska, serves as Special Advisor to the Marine Mammal Commission on Native Affairs.
Personnel The Commission consists of three members nominated by the President and confirmed by the Senate.
The Marine Mammal Protection Act requires that Commissioners be knowledgeable in marine ecology and resource management.
At the end of 2001 the Commissioners were John E. Reynolds, III, Ph.D. (Chairman), Eckerd College, St. Petersburg, Florida, and Mote Marine Laboratory, Sarasota, Florida; Paul K. Dayton, Ph.D., Scripps Institution of Oceanography, La Jolla, California; and Vera Alexander, Ph.D., University of Alaska, Fairbanks.
The Commission's staff includes Robert H. Mattlin, Ph.D., Executive Director; Timothy J. Ragen, 1 Funding Appropriations to the Marine Mammal Commission in the past five fiscal years have been as follows: FY 1997, $1,189,000; FY 1998, $1,185,000; FY 1999, $1,240,000; FY 2000, $1,265,000; and FY 2001, $1,696,260 .
The Commission's appropriation for the current fiscal year, FY 2002, is $1,957,000.
MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2000 2 Chapter II REAUTHORIZATION OF THE MARINE MAMMAL PROTECTION ACT The Marine Mammal Protection Act was enacted in 1972.
Since then, it has been amended and reauthorized several times.
The most recent authorization, enacted in 1994, extended appropriation authority for carrying out the provisions of the Act through fiscal year 1999.
Although the Act has not been reauthorized since, its provisions remain in effect and Congress continues to appropriate funds to carry out its mandates.
As a matter of course, Congress examines the implementation of the Act during the reauthorization process, and it is not uncommon for amendments to be made at such intervals.
For example, major amendments were enacted in 1984, 1988, and 1994, the last three times the Act was reauthorized.
The Act may also be amended at other times, as it was in 1997 when changes were made to the Act's tuna-dolphin provisions (see Chapter IV).
Most recently, the Act was amended by enactment of the Marine Mammal Rescue Assistance Act of 2000, enacted as Title II of Public Law 106-555.
This Act created the John H. Prescott Marine Mammal Rescue Assistance Grant Program and directed the Secretary of Commerce to initiate a study of the environmental and biological factors that may be contributing to the increase in mortality events involving the eastern North Pacific stock of gray whales.
The grant program is discussed in Chapter VI of this report.
additional legislation.
The statement submitted by the Commission provided a comprehensive review of the 1994 amendments, described the steps taken to implement those amendments, and identified those provisions that had yet to be fully implemented.
The statement also identified particular areas where further amendments may be useful and on which Congress may want to focus attention as it considers reauthorizing the Act.
A summary of the Commission's recommendations and the full text of the Commission's statement were included in the 1999 annual report.
Further hearings were held in April 2000 before the House subcommittee.
The Chairman of the Commission testified at the first of two hearings.
That hearing examined implementation of section 118 of the Marine Mammal Protection Act, the regime to govern the taking of marine mammals incidental to commercial fisheries enacted in 1994.
The Commission's testimony summarized the requirements of the applicable statutory provisions and actions taken to establish take reduction teams to address the most significant sources of marine mammal mortalities and serious injuries.
The Commission noted that the existing statutory framework was fundamentally sound, but offered suggestions as to how the process might be improved.
Further discussion of the Commission's recommendations and the full text of its statement can be found in the 2000 annual report.
The second hearing, at which representatives of the National Marine Fisheries Service, the Fish and Wildlife Service, and Alaska Native organizations testified, examined efforts to conclude and implement cooperative agreements between the Services and Alaska Natives under section 119 of the Marine Mammal Protection Act.
All participants in that hear-ing identified shortcomings regarding the existing provisions and recommended that the Act be amended to authorize the parties to enter into enforceable agree3 Background Congress began the process to reauthorize the Marine Mammal Protection Act in 1999.
As discussed in previous annual reports, the Subcommittee on Fisheries Conservation, Wildlife, and Oceans of the House Resources Committee held an initial hearing on 29 June 1999.
The Marine Mammal Commission and the other federal agencies with primary responsibilities under the Act testified on implementation of the 1994 amendments and identified problems that may warrant MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2001 ments that would allow for the management of subsistence harvests before designation of the affected marine mammal stock as depleted.
As discussed in the previous annual report, the two Services, along with the Commission, met with representatives of Alaska Native organizations following that hearing to fashion a proposal for Congressional consideration that would expand the existing authority for cooperative agreements to enable the parties to set harvest limits for both depleted and nondepleted species.
The joint proposal on co-management of subsistence taking by Alaska Natives was a central element of a proposed bill transmitted to Congress by the Secretaries of Commerce and the Interior during the 2000 legislative session.
That bill also would have authorized appropriations for the Marine Mammal Commission, the Department of Commerce, and the Department of the Interior to carry out their responsibilities under the Act through fiscal year 2005.
Further, the bill recommended extensive revisions to the Act to address various problems that had arisen since the last reauthorization and to clarify certain provisions of the 1994 and 1997 amendments.
Among other things, the proposed bill would have amended the Act to clarify the purposes for which marine mammals may be exported from the United States, streamline the process for permitting the import of polar bear trophies from Canada, prohibit the display of cetaceans in traveling exhibits, expand the coverage of section 118 to include incidental taking by certain recreational fishermen, eliminate the requirement to prepare a take reduction plan for those strategic stocks for which fishery-related mortality and serious injury are negligible, increase the available penalties under the Act, authorize funding for research grants under section 110 of the Act, and revise the statutory definition of the term harassment.
The full text of the amendments proposed in 2000, along with the statement of purpose and need prepared at that time, can be found on the National Marine Fisheries Service's web page (http://www.nmfs.noaa.gov).
Activities in 2001 Early in 2001 a new session of Congress began and a new administration took office.
With these changes came a need to revisit the proposal that had been transmitted to Congress by the Departments of Commerce and the Interior in 2000.
The interagency process that had led to development of the earlier proposal was reinitiated.
The Commission's staff worked closely with counterparts at the other involved agencies, primarily the National Marine Fisheries Service and the Fish and Wildlife Service, to review and revise the earlier proposal.
Based on those discussions, the Department of Commerce prepared a new draft Administration proposal, which was submitted for clearance in late October 2001.
That proposal was still undergoing interagency review as of the end of the year.
Thus, the Commission is unable to discuss in this report the specifics of any proposed amendments that might be offered by the Administration during the upcoming reauthorization of the Act.
On 11 October 2001 the Subcommittee on Fisheries Conservation, Wildlife, and Oceans of the House Resources Committee held a day-long oversight hearing on the Marine Mammal Protection Act to consider a broad range of topics bearing on reauthorization and possible amendments.
The Commission's Chairman participated on a panel of government agencies and, along with the heads of the National Marine Fisheries Service and the Fish and Wildlife Service, provided an assessment of the implementation of the 1994 amendments to the Act and identified areas where amendments would be useful.
A representative of the Department of State also participated on that panel, presenting testimony concerning the bilateral polar bear agreement concluded between the United States and the Russian Federation in October 2000.
Other panels focused on issues related to ocean noise and the deployment of Navy sonar systems, marine mammalfishery interactions, cooperative efforts between Alaska Natives and federal agencies to manage subsistence hunting of marine mammals, public 4 Chapter II Reauthorization of the MMPA display permits, and the conservation of California sea otters.
The text of the Commission's testimony can be found in Appendix D of this report.
The statements of many of the other witnesses who testified at the hearing can be found at the House Resources Committee's web site (http://resourcescommittee.house.gov/).
The Commission's testimony focused on updating the subcommittee on recent actions that had been taken to implement the 1994 amendments, identifying those actions that had yet to be completed, and calling attention to those areas where amendments might be warranted.
Although the full text of the Commission's statement is provided as an appendix to this report, a summary is provided below.
With respect to the incidental taking of marine mammals in commercial fisheries, the Commission noted that efforts to reduce the mortality and serious injury of Gulf of Maine harbor porpoises to below the stock's potential biological removal level apparently have been successful.
The Commission explained that much of this reduction had resulted from measures instituted under applicable fishery management plans, which could be changed without due regard to the impact on marine mammals, and noted the need to consolidate these take reduction gains under the Marine Mammal Protection Act authority.
The testimony also discussed the establishment of a new take reduction team to address the incidental taking of bottlenose dolphins in various fisheries along the Atlantic coast.
The Commission indicated that the process for convening take reduction teams, translating the team's recommendations into final take reduction plans, and implementing those plans could be improved.
Among the possible refinements to the process identified by the Commission were appointing a technical liaison to each team and requiring the National Marine Fisheries Service, once it had formulated proposed implementing regulations, to consult with the take reduction team to explain and solicit advice concerning any deviations from the draft plan recommended by the team.
Other fishery-related issues raised by the Commission included the need to (1) abolish the requirement for preparing a take reduction plan for all strategic stocks, even when mortality and serious injury from fisheries are inconsequential, (2) clarify that a vessel owner participating in a category I or II fishery without having registered constitutes a violation of the Act regardless 5 of whether incidental takes occur, (3) specify that the Act's observer requirements apply to all vessels participating in category I and II fisheries whether they are registered or not, (4) factor any mortality or serious injury of California sea otters into determinations regarding the categorization of fisheries and the placement of observers even though incidental taking of this stock is not authorized under section 118 of the Act, (5) consider expansion of the incidental take regime to include non-commercial fishermen that fish in areas and use gear that is identical or similar to that used by their commercial counterparts, and (6) explore options to increase funding for observer programs.
The Commission also focused on the Act's zero mortality and serious injury rate goal, which was to have been achieved by April 2001.
Although the National Marine Fisheries Service was to have reported to Congress in 1998 on the progress made toward meeting that goal, completion of that report is still pending.
The Commission recognized that achieving the goal within seven years, as mandated in the 1994 amendments, may have been overly ambitious.
Nevertheless, the Commission believed that completion of a report remained a worthwhile undertaking and encouraged Congress to adopt a revised schedule for its submission.
The Commission further recommended that Congress adopt a revised schedule for meeting the zero mortality and serious injury rate goal and provide sufficient resources to enable the agencies and the affected fishermen to adhere to that schedule.
The Commission's testimony also called the subcommittee's attention to the reports submitted by the National Marine Fisheries Service concerning pinniped-fishery interactions in Gulf of Maine aquaculture operations and the impacts of California sea lions and Pacific harbor seals on salmonid stocks and Pacific coast ecosystems.
Although no specific recommendations were made by the Commission, it indicated its willingness to work with legislators as they consider whether amendments are needed to address these issues.
The Commission provided a summary of actions that had been taken by the responsible agencies to implement the extensive revisions to the Act's permit provisions included in the 1994 amendments.
In this regard, the Commission noted that the Fish and Wildlife Service had concentrated its efforts on implement- MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2001 ing the provision authorizing the importation of polar bear trophies from Canada, but had yet to amend its other permit regulations to reflect any of the 1994 amendments.
In contrast, the National Marine Fisheries Service had issued new regulations implementing several of the amended provisions and was in the process of revising its regulations on public display permits.
The Commission's testimony also identified several permit-related provisions in need of review.
In light of the prohibition on exporting marine mammals added to the Act in 1994, an amendment to provide specific authority for issuing export permits should be considered.
Also, the Commission explained that little purpose is served by the existing notice and comment requirements as they apply to polar bear trophy import permits and that considerable savings could be realized if they were eliminated.
Two other pressing issues flagged by the Commission were the risks associated with returning captive marine mammals to the wild and the appropriateness of permitting traveling marine mammal exhibits, particularly those displaying cetaceans.
Questions involving the maintenance of polar bears in a traveling exhibit touring Puerto Rico (see Chapter X for further information on this issue) were also discussed in the Commission's testimony.
The export prohibition added to the Act in 1994 created other problems.
First, the wording of the provision resurrected an enforcement problem originally rectified in 1981 that requires the government to demonstrate that the underlying taking of a marine mammal was in violation of the Act when pursuing an action for illegal transport, purchase, sale, or export.
Second, because the prohibition was enacted as part of a suite of permit-related amendments, it did not comprehensively consider all purposes for which exports should be authorized.
The Commission indicated that the legislation under consideration within the Administration likely would make specific suggestions to address these issues.
The Commission also noted that the definition of the term "harassment," added to the Act in 1994, had created difficulties related to interpretation and enforcement.
However, no specific solutions to these problems were proposed.
A 1994 amendment to section 113 of the Act called on the Secretary of the Interior, acting through 6 the Secretary of State and in consultation with the Marine Mammal Commission and the State of Alaska, to consult with appropriate Russian officials in an effort to develop and implement enhanced cooperative research and management programs for conserving the shared population of polar bears.
The Commission noted that, pursuant to this directive, the United States had negotiated a bilateral agreement with the Russian Federation for these purposes.
The Commission further noted that the advice and consent of the Senate is needed before the agreement enters into force.
This being the case, ratification documents and proposed implementing legislation were being prepared for transmission to Congress.
(See the polar bear section in Chapter III for further discussion of the agreement.)
The Commission's testimony also provided information on the status of cooperative agreements between Alaska Native organizations and federal agencies under section 119 of the Marine Mammal Protection Act and on efforts to develop proposed legislation to address the shortcomings in the existing statutory authority.
Although consensus language had been developed in 2000, it was being reviewed by the Commission and other agencies in the context of developing a new Administration proposal.
The Commission recommended that the provisions authorizing appropriations under the Act be reauthorized for a five-year period.
In addition, the Commission identified a need to expand the authority under section 405 to enable the Department of Commerce to allocate generally appropriated funds to unusual mortality event responses.
Currently, only donations and specifically earmarked monies can be placed in the response fund.
Other issues identified by the Commission as meriting attention during the reauthorization process included (1) the desirability of increasing the Act's penalty provisions to reflect changed economic circumstances since they were originally enacted in 1972, (2) the elimination of a provision severely limiting the amount the Commission can spend on outside experts and consultants, (3) a provision to allow the National Marine Fisheries Service to use penalties collected for violations of the Act to further the conservation of species under its jurisdiction (the Fish and Wildlife Service already has such authority), (4) possible ways to improve compliance with and enforcement of the Chapter II Reauthorization of the MMPA Act, and (5) a review of research projects under section 110 of the Act to focus on pressing, broad-scale issues.
On 9 November 2001 the Commission was sent a series of follow-up questions from members of the subcommittee.
Those questions focused on four issues -- ocean noise, the Act's definition of harassment, polar bear sport hunting, and problems associated with the maintenance of polar bears at a traveling exhibit in Puerto Rico.
The Commission drafted its responses to these questions and submitted them for review within the Administration before transmittal to Congress.
As of the end of the year, the Commission was still waiting for comments from several of the reviewing agencies.
It is expected that Congress will again turn its attention to the reauthorization of the Marine Mammal Protection Act during the 2002 session.
Representative Wayne T. Gilchrest, Chairman of the Subcommittee on Fisheries Conservation, Wildlife, and Oceans, has stated that reauthorization of the Act, along with reauthorization of the Magnuson-Stevens Fishery Conservation and Management Act, will be top priorities of the subcommittee during 2002.
7 Chapter III SPECIES OF SPECIAL CONCERN Section 202 of the Marine Mammal Protection Act directs the Marine Mammal Commission, in consultation with its Committee of Scientific Advisors, to make recommendations to the Department of Commerce, the Department of the Interior, and other agencies on actions needed to conserve marine mammals.
To meet this charge, the Commission devotes special attention to particular species and populations that are vulnerable to various types of human impacts.
Also during 2001 the Right Whale Research Consortium, an organization of non-governmental research groups including the New England Aquarium, the Center for Coastal Studies, the University of Rhode Island, Woods Hole Oceanographic Institution, and others cooperating on studies of North Atlantic right whales, sponsored a $10,000 award competition for developing equipment or ideas to prevent or mitigate entanglement risks for right whales.
From 20 entrants, five finalists were selected to receive cash awards or prizes for their work on (1) a new design for a breakaway link on gillnet head ropes, (2) equipment to keep trap and net buoys on the seafloor while gear is actively fishing, (3) a gun to attach a tail harness for helping to disentangle whales, (4) a device to cut ropes from entangled whales, and (5) a chemical process to speed the degradation of lost and discarded ropes and nets.
Also in 2001 the Massachusetts Division of Marine Fisheries began funding a project initiated in 1999 by local lobster fishermen to remove lost and illegal lobster traps from Cape Cod Bay.Initially funded as a pilot project by the International Fund for Animal Welfare in 2000 with assistance from the Massachusetts Division of Environmental Law Enforcement, the project involves the removal of any lobster traps that are not legally set between 1 January and 15 May when the number of right whales in the bay peaks.
During this period, lobster traps must meet certain gear specifications (e.g., have at least four traps per buoy, use sinking line between traps, and have a weak link between the buoy and buoy line) and be properly marked.
Any gear not properly marked or otherwise found to be noncompliant is pulled from the water to reduce entanglement threats to whales.
Collisions between Ships and Right Whales The major known cause of human-related right whale deaths and the cause of nearly half of all confirmed right whale deaths since the early 1990s is collisions with ships.
At least two of five dead right whales found in 2001 were killed by ships.
Based on the large size of propeller slashes and the presence of massive bones broken or crushed in examined struck whales, it appears that the vast majority of such deaths are caused by large ships, although calves, in particular, may be killed by smaller vessels.
An analysis of collisions between ships and all species of large whales recently organized by the Commission (see Chapter VIII) found that the majority of serious or lethal injuries was due to ships 80 m (262 ft) or longer.
The Commission commented to the Service in support of the proposed rule on 26 October 2000.
In 1935 most whaling nations agreed to ban the hunting of right whales, making them the first of the great whales to receive international protection from whaling.
Although the 1949 Convention for the Regulation of Whaling extended the ban to all whaling nations, right whales continued to be killed illegally or for authorized scientific research until the early 1970s.
Today North Atlantic right whales are less numerous than pandas, gorillas, and most tigers, and are among the world's most endangered animals.
Their recovery poses perhaps the greatest and most urgent challenge facing marine mammal management in U.S. waters.The first scientific descriptions of right whales in the eighteenth and nineteenth centuries used skull morphology and geographic distribution to distinguish two species: northern right whales (E. glacialis), found in the North Atlantic and North Pacific Oceans, and southern right whales (E. australis), found in the South Atlantic, South Pacific, and Antarctic Oceans.
This was the accepted taxonomic classification in 1973 when the U.S. Endangered Species Act was adopted, and both northern and southern right whales were listed as endangered on the list of endangered and threatened species.
Recent genetic studies, however, reveal that right whales in the North Atlantic and North Pacific Oceans are two distinct species -- E. glacialis and E. japonica, respectively.
Unlike past annual reports, this report therefore treats them as separate species.
North Atlantic Right Whale (Eubalaena glacialis) The North Atlantic right whale is one of three right whale species.
As a group, right whales were the first large whales to be hunted commercially -- as early as the tenth century off Japan and the eleventh centuryMARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2001 Table 1.
Marine mammals listed as endangered (E) or threatened (T) under the Endangered Species Act and depleted (D) under the Marine Mammal Protection Act, as of 31 December 2001 Scientific Name Trichechus manatus Trichechus inunguis Trichechus senegalensis Dugong dugon Status E/D E/D T/D E/D Range Caribbean Sea and North Atlantic from southeastern United States to Brazil; and Greater Antilles Islands Amazon River basin of South America West African coast and rivers; Senegal to Angola Northern Indian Ocean from Madagascar to Indonesia; Philippines; Australia; southern China; Palau Western South America; Peru to southern Chile Central California coast Caribbean Sea and Bahamas (probably extinct) Hawaiian Archipelago Mediterranean Sea; northwest African coast Baja California, Mexico, to southern California North Pacific Rim from California to Japan North Pacific Rim from Japan to Prince William Sound, Alaska, to California (west of 144�W longitude) North Pacific Rim from Prince William Sound, Alaska, to California (east of 144�W longitude) Lake Saimaa, Finland Changjiang (Yangtze) River, China Indus River and tributaries, Pakistan Northern Gulf of California, Mexico Eastern tropical Pacific Ocean Eastern tropical Pacific Ocean Atlantic coastal waters from New York to Florida Cook Inlet, Alaska North Atlantic, North Pacific Oceans; Bering Sea South Atlantic, South Pacific, Indian, and Southern Oceans Arctic Ocean and adjacent seas Oceanic, all oceans Oceanic, all oceans Oceanic, all oceans Western North Pacific Ocean Oceanic, all oceans Oceanic, all oceans Common Name Manatees and Dugongs West Indian manatee Amazonian manatee West African manatee Dugong Otters Marine otter Lutra felina Southern sea otter Enhydra lutris nereis Seals and Sea Lions Caribbean monk seal Monachus tropicalis Hawaiian monk seal Monachus schauinslandi Mediterranean monk seal Monachus monachus Guadalupe fur seal Arctocephalus townsendi Northern fur seal Callorhinus ursinus Western North Pacific Eumetopias jubatus Steller sea lion Eastern North Pacific Eumetopias jubatus Steller sea lion Saimaa seal Phoca hispida saimensis Whales, Porpoises, and Dolphins Baiji Lipotes vexillifer Indus River dolphin Platanista minor Vaquita Phocoena sinus Stenella attenuata Northeastern offshore spotted dolphin Eastern spinner dolphin Stenella longirostris orientalis Mid-Atlantic coastal Tursiops truncatus bottlenose dolphin Cook Inlet beluga whale Delphinapterus leucas Northern right whale Eubalaena glacialis Southern right whale Eubalaena australis Bowhead whale Balaena mysticetus Humpback whale Megaptera novaeangliae Blue whale Balaenoptera musculus Finback or fin whale Balaenoptera physalus Western Pacific gray whale Eschrichtius robustus Sei whale Balaenoptera borealis Sperm whale Physeter macrocephalus E/D T/D E/D E/D E/D T/D D E/D T/D E/D E/D E/D E/D D D D D E/D E/D E/D E/D E/D E/D E/D E/D E/D Source: Fish and Wildlife Service regulations at 50 C.F.R. �17.11 and National Marine Fisheries Service regulations at 50 C.F.R. �216.15.
10 Chapter III Species of Special Concern Separate populations of North Atlantic right whales are believed to have occurred historically in the eastern and western North Atlantic Ocean.
Excessive whaling, however, has all but eliminated the eastern population.
Its recovery -- if any members still survive -- is highly unlikely.
Over the past 50 years, published records report perhaps 10 reliable right whale sightings off southwestern Europe, including only one cow/calf pair, seen off Portugal in February 1995.
Some, if not all, of those sightings may have involved wandering whales from the western North Atlantic.
The western North Atlantic population, numbering about 300 whales, occurs mainly in coastal waters off eastern North America from Florida to southeastern Canada.
Over the past 20 years, scientists from many groups and government agencies have photographed, identified, and catalogued almost all whales in this population using unique patterns of scars and callosities (i.e., raised patches of rough skin on a whale's head).
Resighting histories recorded in the catalogue enable researchers to assess movements, calving rates, survivorship, and other life history parameters that are vital for monitoring population status and trends.
From early spring through fall, most of the population is found off New England and southeastern Canada where four principal feeding habitats have been identified (see Fig. 1): (1) Cape Cod Bay, used principally between February and April; (2) the Great South Channel and northern edge of Georges Bank east of Cape Cod, used mainly from April through June; (3) the lower Bay of Fundy, just north of the U.S.Canadian border, used most intensively in August and September; and (4) the Roseway Basin off the southern tip of Nova Scotia, used in late summer and fall.
Other potentially important feeding areas may include Jeffreys Ledge off New Hampshire; Block Island Sound off southern New England; coastal waters east of Halifax, Nova Scotia; and the Gulf of St. Lawrence, Canada.
In general, females with nursing calves seem to prefer the more protected inshore areas (e.g., Cape Cod Bay and the Bay of Fundy).
In winter, pregnant females, along with other adults and a few juveniles, migrate south to coastal waters off Georgia and northern Florida.
From January through March, these areas are the population's only known calving grounds.
Where the remaining adults and juveniles overwinter is largely unknown.
The frequent occurrence of whales between January and 11 April in Cape Cod Bay, however, indicates that some whales remain in northern waters year-round.
The population has shown little evidence of recovery over the past 20 years and may be declining.
Recent modeling studies suggest that its numbers increased by about 2 percent per year in the 1980s, but have decreased by about that rate since the early 1990s.
This trend stands in sharp contrast to those of most other large whales, including the southern right whale, which have increased steadily at 4 percent or more per year in recent decades.
Deaths due to ship strikes and entanglement in commercial gillnets and lobster pot lines appear to be a major reason for the population's failure to recover.
From 1991 through 2001, the cause of death for 14 of 28 right whale carcasses found along the eastern United States and Canada was attributed to these causes (11 ship strikes and 3 entanglements), and other such deaths are likely.
For example, a dead right whale seen floating entangled in fishing gear off Rhode Island in 2000 was not considered a fishery-related death because it could not be retrieved for direct examination.
Other deaths due to these and other causes undoubtedly go unobserved.
When combined with natural mortality and the species' low rate of reproduction (a single calf every 3 to 6 years per adult female), human-related deaths could make the principal difference between a population that is declining and one that otherwise would be increasing, albeit slowly.
A recent modeling study suggested that eliminating the deaths of just two female right whales per year could reverse the decline.
Since the early 1980s, when a directed data collection program was first begun, an average of about 12 calves per year has been born.
In 2001 a record high number of calves (31) was seen.
Although an encouraging turn of events, this record comes on the heels of a series of record low calving years.
Between 1998 and 2000 annual calf counts were 6, 4, and 1, respectively.
Thus, even with 31 births in 2001, calf production over the past four years is still slightly less than the previous annual average.
Recent research suggests that fluctuations in calf numbers may reflect variations in right whale food supplies, which could affect the fitness of mature females.
Under the Endangered Species Act and the Marine Mammal Protection Act, the National Marine Fisheries Service is the lead federal agency responsible for the MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2001 12 Chapter III Species of Special Concern Figure 1.
(Opposite page) Designated critical habitats and mandatory ship reporting zones for North Atlantic right whales (figure courtesy of Leslie Ward and Alex Smith, Florida Marine Research Institute). recovery of North Atlantic right whales.
Many other agencies and groups also perform vital research and management tasks.
In addition to the Marine Mammal Commission, cooperating federal and state agencies include the Army Corps of Engineers, the Coast Guard, the Environmental Protection Agency, the Navy, the Florida Fish and Wildlife Conservation Commission, the Georgia Department of Natural Resources, the Maine Department of Natural Resources, the Massachusetts Division of Fisheries, and the Rhode Island Division of Fish and Wildlife.
Key nongovernmental partners include the Center for Coastal Studies, the Humane Society of the United States, the International Fund for Animal Welfare, the Massachusetts Environmental Trust, the New England Aquarium, the University of Rhode Island, the University of Georgia, and Woods Hole Oceanographic Institution.
Recovery work also is closely coordinated with Canada's Department of Fisheries and Oceans, which leads related activities in Canada.
To help organize and coordinate recovery work, the National Marine Fisheries Service prepared a right whale recovery plan in 1991 and subsequently established various advisory teams.
Among the latter, two regional implementation teams are charged with the overview of research and management activities.
One team focuses on the feeding grounds off New England and the other focuses on the calving grounds off Florida and Georgia.
Pursuant to Marine Mammal Protection Act requirements concerning the incidental take of marine mammals in commercial fisheries, the Service also established the Atlantic Large Whale Take Reduction Team to recommend steps to prevent the entanglement of right whales and other large whales in fishing gear.
A representative of the Marine Mammal Commission has participated in meetings of all three teams.
As discussed in previous annual reports, the Commission helped initiate right whale research off the U.S. East Coast in the late 1970s, and it made the initial recommendations for preparing a right whale recovery plan in the 1980s.
In recent years (1996, 1998, and 2000) the Commission has conducted a series of right whale program reviews of recovery work by key program participants to identify research and management priorities.
Results of those efforts are described in past annual reports.
The following section describes developments and activities by the Commission and others in 2001.
Recent Right Whale Mortalities and Injuries From 1970 through 2001, 52 dead right whales have been reported along the eastern United States and Canada (see Fig. 2).
Perhaps two or three times that 13 MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2001 Figure 3.
Track of Churchill, an entangled North Atlantic right whale, between 9 June and 16 September 2001 (figure courtesy of the Center for Coastal Studies). number go unrecorded because carcasses sink, are consumed by scavengers, or otherwise disappear.
As a result, documented carcasses, including those attributed to ship strikes and entanglements, undoubtedly represent only a portion of the total number of actual deaths.
In 2001, six dead right whales were found -- four calves, an adult male, and a whale of unknown age and sex.
Three died of unknown causes, two were struck by ships, and one likely died due to entanglement in fishing gear.
In addition, a seventh whale, last seen badly entangled in gear, almost certainly died.
The first carcass was found floating 6.5 km (3.5 nmi) off Flagler Beach, Florida, on 27 January.
Photographed by a right whale aerial survey team responding to a public sighting report of a dead whale, the carcass was found late in the day.
Efforts to relocate the carcass the next day for retrieval were unsuccessful.
However, on 13 February, the flippers and skin of a right whale calf thought to be remains of the same calf washed ashore a few miles south of Flagler Beach.
Neither the photographs of the floating carcass nor the remains found in February were sufficient to determine cause of death.
The second carcass was found on a beach near Chincoteague, Virginia, on 17 March.
Five large propeller slashes on the dorsal tail stock indicated that the whale was killed by a ship.
The same day, a passenger on a charter fishing boat off Murrell's Inlet, South Carolina, photographed another dead right whale calf.
Unaware of the significance of the observation until seeing a media report on right whales several weeks later, the photographer did not report the carcass until mid-April.
Although the photograph confirmed that the animal was a right whale calf, it was not possible to determine a cause of death.
The fourth carcass was found floating about 3.5 km (2 nmi) off Fire Island, New York, on 18 June.
The Coast Guard immediately responded and towed the carcass ashore.
Twelve large propeller slashes on the head and back indicated that it had been killed by a ship.
The fifth carcass found in 2001 was an adult male with an 18-year sighting history (whale #1238).
It was seen floating in the central Gulf of St. Lawrence on 25 October and washed ashore three days later on the Magdelene Islands, Quebec, Canada.
About 200 m (656 ft) of rope was wrapped around its peduncle and 14 Chapter III Species of Special Concern flippers, suggesting that it died as a result of entanglement in fishing gear that was later identified as part of a "Danish seine."
The last confirmed sighting of the whale alive was on 25 June 2001 when it was seen with no attached gear in the Great South Channel.
The sixth carcass was photographed from a Canadian Coast Guard plane on 3 December about 30 nmi (55.5 km) off the Atlantic coast of Nova Scotia north of Halifax, Canada.
Although photographs confirmed that it was the carcass of a right whale, the carcass was not recovered and it was not possible to determine its cause of death.
Photographs of the carcass showed no signs of entanglement or ship collision injuries.
Several other entanglements and non-lethal injuries varying in severity also have been documented.
At the end of 2000 three whales had been last seen entangled in fishing gear (whales #1130, #1720, and #2223).
The entanglement of whale #1130, found in Cape Cod Bay in early March 2000, was classified as a potentially life-threatening entanglement.
It was trailing line with a yellow buoy and a weight attached.
After an unsuccessful rescue attempt, the whale disappeared for the remainder of 2000 and was not resighted in 2001.
Whale #1720, first seen entangled 148 km (80 nmi) east of Cape Cod in late May 2000, and again in late June, was trailing about 12 m (40 ft) of line.
Although the entanglement was not thought to be life-threatening (that is, it was thought the line would come free without human intervention), the whale was not resighted either later in 2000 or in 2001.
Whale #2223 was first seen entangled in the Bay of Fundy in mid-August 2000 trailing about 60 m (200 ft) of line.
It was not seen again until early spring 2001 in Cape Cod Bay.
At that time, a disentanglement team from the Center for Coastal Studies removed 30 m (100 ft) of line and attached a satellite tag to the remaining line in hopes of relocating the whale to continue disentanglement work.
However, the whale moved out of the Bay and, over the next month, traveled between southern Maine and the edge of the continental shelf about 240 km (130 nmi) southeast of Cape Cod.
In early May, the tag fell off and was later recovered with about 30 m (100 ft) of line attached.
Drag from the satellite tag apparently helped pull the line free, and on 8 June 2001 the whale was resighted by an aerial survey team in the Great South Channel with no gear attached.
Figure 4.
Pole system used to inject tranquilizing drugs into Churchill (photo courtesy of the Center for Coastal Studies).
In 2001 four new entanglements were observed, two of which were considered potentially lifethreatening.
The first of the severe entanglements (whale #1102, named Churchill) received intense national media attention.
The whale was an adult male first reported by an aerial survey team as entangled on 8 June, 139 km (75 nmi) east of Cape Cod in the Great South Channel.
It was trailing about 30 m (100 ft) of line and had line wrapped tightly around its upper jaw, which was cutting into the skin.
The entanglement was considered potentially lethal and on 9 June a disentanglement team attached a satellite tag to the trailing line.
The National Marine Fisheries Service organized an extensive rescue effort, and during the following weeks, there were several rescue attempts.
Some of these involved the first efforts ever made to immobilize a large whale with drugs in the open ocean (see Fig. 3) so that workers could remove the embedded line.
Although the drugs were successfully injected, they had little or no apparent effect on the animal.
Between June and mid-September, the whale traveled more than 10,000 km (5,500 nmi), spending most of its time out of rescue range (Fig. 4).
At its last sighting on 23 August, the whale's condition had declined markedly, with evidence of significant weight loss and widespread infection.
On 16 September tag transmissions stopped about 850 km (460 nmi) east of Cape May, New Jersey, where the animal presumably died and sank.
15 MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2001 The second serious entanglement (whale #2427) involved a seven-year-old male found by a whalewatching boat 56 km (30 nmi) east of Portsmouth, New Hampshire, on 20 July.
The whale was immobile with its head out of the water, and had a line trailing from both sides of its mouth.
A partially deflated buoy was attached.
A line was wrapped tightly around its rostrum and baleen was hanging out of its mouth.
A disentanglement team from the Center for Coastal Studies in Cape Cod successfully removed all but a short length of line caught in the baleen.
The whale sustained what may have been a serious injury and was later seen with its head still out of the water and baleen still extending from its mouth.
In addition to the two serious entanglements, two other unidentified whales were also seen entangled.
The first was seen on 2 February off the tip of Cape Cod, Massachusetts.
It had line across the back behind the blow hole but did not appear to be in need of assistance.
The second was a juvenile whale with a minor entanglement seen on 13 September 2001 in the Bay of Fundy shipping channel by right whale researchers.
About 7.5 m (25 feet) of red line trailed from its mouth or left flipper.
Disentanglement efforts were not considered necessary.
Neither animal was resighted in 2001 to determine if the entangling gear had been shed.
Thus, at the end of 2001 five whales had been last seen entangled: two with serious entanglements (#1130 first seen in 2000 and whale #1102, which probably died), and three with what appeared to be minor entanglements (#1720 and two unidentified whales).
In addition, the fate of the disentangled whale last seen with baleen extending from its mouth (#2427) was uncertain.
In addition to these entanglements, an adult female (#1160) accompanied by a newborn calf was photographed off southern Georgia on 29 January 2001 with propeller wounds from a recent vessel strike.
The wounds, which were faint and unnoticed at the time, included two parallel lines of propeller slashes 34 km (1012 ft) long.
Based on appearance, the wounds were caused by a vessel, perhaps a few tens of meters long with twin propellers.
On 26 February the whale was resighted off Hilton Head, South Carolina, still accompanied by her calf.
By then, the propeller slashes were clearly visible.
Several subsequent resightings suggest that, although the injury was serious, it was not life-threatening and the wounds have begun to heal.
North Atlantic Right Whale Recovery Plan Following a series of recommendations by the Marine Mammal Commission, the National Marine Fisheries Service developed and in 1991 adopted a recovery plan for northern right whales pursuant to provisions in the Endangered Species Act.
The plan focused mainly on recovery needs for right whales in the North Atlantic and, to a lesser extent, on right whales in the North Pacific.
To incorporate new information and reassess priority needs, the Service subsequently began preparation of a new recovery plan devoted exclusively to North Atlantic right whales.
A draft plan was completed and circulated for public review and comment in July 2001.
Among other things, the draft plan concluded that existing regulatory measures to prevent ship collisions appear to be adequate, but that steps to assess and implement voluntary or mandatory speed and routing measures would be considered if ship strikes continue at unacceptable levels.
To reduce mortality caused by commercial fisheries, the draft plan identified steps to (1) design and incorporate gear modifications to make fishing gear less likely to entangle whales, (2) consider strengthening time-area fishing closures in areas where right whales occur, and (3) continue and expand whale disentanglement efforts.
In response to the request for comments, the Commission wrote to the Service on 6 September 2001.
The Commission noted that the draft revision was a substantial improvement over the 1991 plan.
However, it strongly disagreed with the Service's conclusion that existing measures to prevent ship strikes are adequate.
The Commission also noted that information from a study organized by the Commission to assess factors affecting the likelihood of ships hitting whales (see Laist et al. 2001in Appendix C and Chapter VIII) was not considered in the draft plan.
The Commission therefore recommended that the draft be modified to (1) note that existing regulatory mechanisms are not adequate to mitigate collisions between ships and right whales and (2) incorporate information from the study on collisions between ships and whales.
The Commission also recommended that the draft plan be expanded to (1) provide an assessment of possible impacts on right whales from anthropogenic sources of sound in the marine environment, (2) review information on whale vocalization patterns, and (3) describe in greater detail the tasks needed to develop 16 Chapter III Species of Special Concern geographic information system databases, assess compliance with adopted regulatory measures, and coordinate related enforcement efforts by the Coast Guard and state agencies.
At the end of 2001 the Service was reviewing comments by the Commission and others and revising the document.
Congressional Appropriations for Right Whale Recovery Concerned about the status of North Atlantic right whales, Congress has significantly increased funding for right whale recovery work in recent years.
For fiscal year 2001, it appropriated $5 million, including $2.9 million to be distributed as grants by the Northeast Consortium (a group of New England universities) and $2.1 million to meet the responsibilities of the National Marine Fisheries Service.
With its funds, the Northeast Consortium requested proposals and awarded grants to 16 new and ongoing projects.
Most of the funds were used to support studies to monitor right whales in the Bay of Fundy and Cape Cod Bay, assess methods of detecting right whales with passive acoustic technology, improve and test satellite tags for tracking right whales, assess right whale hearing capabilities, analyze vessel management options, investigate right whale feeding and prey availability, study right whale reproduction, help the state of Maine develop a program to reduce entanglement risks in fishing gear, and assess factors contributing to the risk of collisions between right whales and ships.
With regard to funding provided to the Service, a spending plan was to have been developed by 30 January 2001.
Completion of the plan was delayed by several months and, although the Commission was not provided a copy for review, it is the Commission's understanding that the funds were used in part to support aerial surveys for right whales in the calving grounds and in feeding areas off New England, to operate mandatory ship reporting systems in both the calving grounds and feeding grounds off Massachusetts, to develop and test fishing gear modifications less likely to entangle whales, and to convene implementation team meetings and meetings of the take reduction team to help identify and coordinate necessary research and management actions.
For fiscal year 2002, Congress again increased funding for right whale recovery work.
It appropriated $6.85 million, of which $1.5 million is for supporting cooperative state programs, $1 million is to complete projects initiated by the Northeast Consortium's 2001 right whale grant-making program, and $4.35 million is for work by the National Marine Fisheries Service.
As a related matter, the Commission wrote to the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration on 19 June 2001 on the need to request funds for the development and support of state conservation programs on right whales, as well as Hawaiian monk seals and other endangered marine mammals.
The Commission noted that state agencies offer knowledge, personnel, expertise, resources, and legal authority to help carry out urgent research and management tasks concerning endangered marine mammals.
To help develop state programs, section 6 of the Endangered Species Act authorizes the Secretaries of the Interior and Commerce to enter into cooperative agreements with state agencies on work to conserve endangered species.
It also authorizes the Secretaries to request appropriations for federal matching funds to help develop and implement those agreements.
Although the Fish and Wildlife Service has routinely requested and received funding under section 6, the Commission noted that the National Marine Fisheries Service had never made such requests for state programs addressing endangered marine mammals under its jurisdiction.
Therefore, the Commission recommended that the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration (1) examine the existing and potential role of state agencies in carrying out recovery program tasks for right whales and other endangered species under its jurisdiction, (2) where appropriate, develop cooperative agreements with states under section 6 to establish and clarify state agency involvement in those recovery programs, (3) annually determine funding levels appropriate for federal support of those programs, and (4) exercise the authority to request such funding for state activities that contribute to the recovery of right whales and other endangered marine mammals under its jurisdiction.
On 16 July 2001 the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration responded to the Commission's letter noting that it had several cooperative agreements with state agencies under section 6 and was pursuing agreements with several other states.
It also noted that, although it had not received base funding for those agreements, it had issued grants to help support state 17 MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2001 work on certain species.
The agency also agreed that everything possible should be done to work with states and advised the Commission that it intended to request funding for section 6 agreements in its fiscal year 2003 budget.
Entanglement of Right Whales in Fishing Gear Commercial fishing gear poses a significant entanglement risk for North Atlantic right whales.
Although only 3 of 52 confirmed deaths since 1970 have been attributed to entanglement, it is likely that the number of such deaths is significantly greater.
Some confirmed deaths due to unknown causes are likely by entanglement, and nearly two-thirds of all North Atlantic right whales bear scars from past entanglement.
In addition, a recent analysis found that 28 animals had sustained serious entanglement injuries between 1970 and 1999.
Although 20 of those injuries proved to be non-fatal, based on resightings, in 8 cases whales disappeared after being last seen either severely entangled or with what were considered possibly fatal entanglement injuries.
Most of the latter whales have not been resighted for six or more years and are presumed to have died.
Development of a Take Reduction Plan To reduce entanglement risks, the National Marine Fisheries Service formed the Atlantic Large Whale Take Reduction Team in 1996.
The team is composed of representatives from relevant fisheries, federal and state agencies (including the Marine Mammal Commission), environmental organizations, and the research community.
Its charge includes developing agreed measures for reducing the incidental take of right whales in Atlantic coast gillnet and lobster trap fisheries to a level less than the species' calculated potential biological removal (PBR) level.
The PBR is calculated using a formula designed to estimate the number of animals that could be removed from a population (other than by natural causes) while maintaining a high degree of assurance that it would increase toward its optimum sustainable population level.
Because of its critical status, the PBR level for North Atlantic right whales has been determined to be zero.
After several meetings, the team recommended measures that the Service considered in developing an Atlantic Large Whale Take Reduction Plan.
The Service then adopted interim final rules on 22 July 1997 to implement the final plan's regulatory measures.
With minor changes, those rules were adopted as final rules on 16 February 1999.
Serious entanglements continued to occur, however, and the Service therefore reconvened the team in February 2000 and adopted additional regulatory changes on 21 December 2000.
The plan's major regulatory mechanisms have included seasonal fishing closures in designated right whale critical habitats and requirements for using fishing gear design features thought to reduce whale entanglement risks.
Major non-regulatory measures include efforts to disentangle whales and to develop and test new fishing gear designs less likely to entangle large whales.
As discussed in previous annual reports, the Commission has written to the Service on numerous occasions expressing its belief that the plan's regulatory measures are too weak to offer much protection against entanglement risks, and that too much faith for resolving the problem has been placed on disentangling whales and requiring gear specifications of questionable effectiveness.
Before 2001 gear requirements for most areas included use of a gear feature selected from a list of options, such as the use of buoy lines no thicker than 7/16 inch (1.11 cm), that either were already standard practice or offered questionable benefit for reducing entanglement risks.
The Commission also noted that seasonal fishing closures for critical habitats allowed almost all gillnet or lobster fishing in those areas before the closures went into effect to continue and expand.
As a result, in most cases the regulations required little or no change in either the design of gear or where it could be set.
Believing that the surest way to reduce entanglement risks was to remove hazardous gear from areas where right whales are most abundant, the Commission therefore recommended that the Service strengthen the seasonal fishing closures in designated critical habitats to prohibit gillnets and lobster traps during times of peak right whale abundance.
These recommendations, however, have not been adopted.
Evaluation of Additional Protection Needs As noted above, serious entanglements of right whales continued to occur in 2001.
To reduce those risks, the Service began to issue alerts to advise fishermen when and where groups of right whales had been seen feeding.
To guide this process of issuing alerts, Service scientists developed criteria to identify when they should be issued and the areas to be covered.
By 18 Chapter III Species of Special Concern examining past whale sighting data, they determined that an initial sighting of three or more whales with a sighting density of at least four whales per 100 nmi2 was a useful indicator of a feeding group that could remain in an area for a week or more.
They also determined that a 15 nmi (27 km) buffer around an initial sighting area usually would encompass the whales' movements during the course of a feeding event.
Following these criteria, in March 2001 the Service began issuing alerts whenever groups of right whales were detected.
More than a dozen alerts were announced in 2001, requesting that fishermen voluntarily avoid setting gear in sighting areas and that they reduce the number of buoy lines on gear already set.
Each alert was for a 15-day period unless the Service confirmed that whales had left the area.
In one case, to protect a group of 13 feeding right whales, the Service also published a rule requiring that all gillnets be removed from the area within 48 hours and that at least 50 percent of the vertical lines on all lobster pots be removed.
The Service also reinitiated formal consultations under section 7 of the Endangered Species Act for each of four fishery management plans governing Atlantic coast gillnet (the multispecies groundfish, spiny dogfish, and monkfish fisheries) and lobster trap fisheries.
These consultations ended on 14 June 2001 with a set of biological opinions that concluded that all of the respective fisheries were jeopardizing the continued existence of the North Atlantic right whale.
Each opinion therefore identified a set of reasonable and prudent alternatives that included (1) additional gear research and modification requirements, (2) the development of a dynamic area management process to temporarily close or manage fishing in areas where right whale feeding aggregations are observed, and (3) the development of seasonal management areas in right whale feeding grounds outside critical habitats where either (a) fishing would be prohibited in seasons whales are likely to be present or (b) fishermen would be required to use fishing gear that "has been proven to prevent serious injury or mortality to right whales."
On 2728 June 2001 the Service reconvened the Atlantic Large Whale Take Reduction Team in Portland, Maine, to obtain advice on implementing the reasonable and prudent alternatives.
In part, the team considered whether and what "whale safe" gear (gear with no risk of entangling whales) or "low risk" gear (gear that was highly unlikely to kill or seriously injure whales) might be acceptable for use in seasonal management areas.
In this regard, it identified, but did not reach consensus on, possible gear design requirements and fishing practices that might allow gillnets and lobster gear to be used in seasonal management areas.
Proposed Regulatory Changes to the Take Reduction Plan Based in part on the team's advice, the Service published three Federal Register notices in October 2001 on proposed rules to strengthen the Atlantic Large Whale Take Reduction Plan.
The first, published on 1 October, proposed new requirements for lobster gear and gillnet designs to make them less likely to entangle whales.
For most gear, the existing rules required the use of one gear design feature from a list of several options specific for each gear type.
Those options included features, such as weak links or line no thicker than 7/16th inch, which the Service believed whales could break and thereby free themselves.
The notice proposed changes to those options for different gear types in different areas.
For northern inshore lobster traps, the Service determined that one of the options on its gear technology list -- use of buoy line no thicker than 7/16 in (1.11 cm) -- was not an appropriate entanglement risk reduction tool because line thickness was not necessarily proportionate to line strength.
It therefore proposed replacing this option in January 2003 with an option for using sinking line or neutrally buoyant line between traps.
Because many traps are linked with floating line that can rise in loops up through the water column and entangle swimming whales, use of sinking or neutrally buoyant line that lies on the bottom was believed to be a useful way of reducing entanglement risks.
The Service advised that it was deferring this action until 2003 because a fisherman reported excessive wear with weak links on buoys.
The Service apparently was concerned that northern inshore lobster fishermen would be left with too few options from which to select if the 7/16th-in line was dropped.
Other proposed changes included the following: (1) for southern nearshore lobster traps, replacing the gear option list with a requirement for using on buoys 600-lb (272-kg) weak links that would separate without leaving a knot on the end of lines so that lines might slip more easily through whale baleen, (2) for offshore lobster traps, requiring that weak links on surface buoys 19 MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2001 and high flyers (flags used to mark gear locations) be reduced from 3,780 lbs (1,714.6 kg) to 2,000 lbs (907.2 kg), while retaining a 3,780-lb weak link between the buoy line and the surface buoy system, and (3) for midAtlantic anchored gillnet gear, replacing the gear option list with requirements for using 1,100-lb (499-kg) knotless weak links on the buoys and on the float line at the center of each gillnet panel.
On 2 October the Service published a proposed rule to formalize a dynamic area management process similar to the whale alert effort it began earlier in 2001 to provide protection for feeding aggregations of whales found at unpredictable locations.
The rules proposed the possible imposition of fishing restrictions for periods of up to 15 days within 15 nmi (27 km) of the locations where three or more whales were observed or thought to be feeding, such that their density is equal to or greater than 0.04 whales per nmi2.
The restrictions, which would take effect two days after being published in the Federal Register, could require either that owners of gillnets and lobster traps remove their gear from the area or that fishing be limited to gear with certain modifications set forth by the Service.
In deciding whether to impose restrictions and what restrictions might be required, the Service noted that it would consider several factors, such as recent whale entanglements, how much fishing gear was in the area, weather conditions that might prevent fishermen from safely removing gear, and whether the area was near other fishery closure areas.
On 3 October the Service published an advanced notice of proposed rulemaking requesting comments on a possible action to establish a new seasonal area management process at an unspecified future date.
Similar to dynamic area management zones, the seasonal zones could involve requirements to reduce, eliminate, or modify fishing gear within designated areas.
However, under the seasonal process, the restrictions would apply seasonally in areas other than critical habitats where past sighting data indicated that right whales predictably form seasonal feeding aggregations.
On 31 October 2001 the Commission commented to the Service on all three notices.
It reiterated its concern that the Service was placing too much reliance on gear design requirements with questionable and possibly limited value for reducing entanglement risks.
Given the urgency for reducing right whale entanglements, the Commission noted that strong reliance on gear design requirements as a risk reduction tool was warranted only when there is a solid reason to believe that they would reduce entanglement risks.
For example, replacing floating line between lobster traps with neutrally buoyant or sinking line would eliminate line from the water column and clearly reduce entanglement risks.
Likewise, prohibiting the use of hazardous gear in times and areas where whales are most abundant could reasonably be assumed to reduce risk.
Conversely, although weak links may eventually prove helpful for reducing entanglements, their effectiveness has not been demonstrated and may prove to be minimal.
Accordingly, although such devices should be encouraged, they should not be relied upon to resolve entanglement problems in the short term when other, more certain means of risk reduction exist.
In this regard, the Commission expressed concern about the Service's proposal to defer the removal of the gear requirement option for using 7/16th-inch (1.11cm) buoy lines for inshore lobster waters (which the Service had determined to be inappropriate as a riskreduction measure), while also deferring the addition of an option for using neutrally buoyant line between lobster traps (an option that has a clear benefit for reducing entanglement risks).
The Commission also expressed concern that the Service was not proceeding immediately to develop rules for seasonal area management zones, and that the proposals left it unclear precisely when and what restrictions would be imposed under the dynamic and seasonal area management processes.
Among other things, the Commission therefore recommended that the Service: � modify the lobster take reduction technology list by deleting 7/16-in (1.11-cm) line and adding neutrally buoyant line for ground lines and buoy lines immediately, rather than deferring the changes until January 2003; � assess the effectiveness of weak links and knotless lines by examining lines removed from whales, as well as photographs of entangled whales, to evaluate the extent to which knots tied by fishermen may have contributed to entanglements; � describe how it intends to apply certain factors identified for the purpose of determining whether to impose restrictions under the dynamic management process; and 20 Chapter III Species of Special Concern � by spring 2002, implement final rules to establish a seasonal area management zone for an area north of Georges Bank between Cape Cod and the Hague Line, thereby prohibiting gillnet and lobster fishing in spring and early summer in that area until such time as fishing gear unlikely to injure or kill right whales has been developed and proven effective.
With regard to the latter recommendation, the Service on 28 November 2001 published a proposed rule to implement a seasonal area management zone north of Georges Bank.
The proposal called for seasonal gear requirements within the western third of the zone during March and April and in the eastern two-thirds of the zone during May, June, and July.
During these periods, lobster gear would be required to have sinking or neutrally buoyant line between traps, a single buoy on each string of traps, and a 1,500-lb (680-kg) weak link at the surface buoy and high flyer.
Gillnets would be required to use five 1,100-lb (499kg) weak links on each net panel and to have a 22-lb (9.98-kg) Danforth-style anchor at each end of the gillnet.
The Commission provided comments on the proposal to the Service on 13 December 2001, expressing its appreciation to the Service for moving quickly to the proposed rulemaking stage and its support for establishing the proposed zone.
It also noted that the requirement for the use of sinking line or neutrally buoyant line on offshore lobster traps should reduce potential entanglement risks.
However, the Commission also noted that reliance on weak links to prevent entanglement risks from buoy lines on lobster traps and gillnets appeared inconsistent with the recommended reasonable and prudent alternative in the biological opinion for restricting gear to that which "has been proven to prevent serious injury or mortality to right whales."
In this regard, it noted that information accompanying the proposed rule referred to a case in which required weak links had not been successful in preventing the entanglement of the right whale disentangled in July 2001.
To be consistent with the standard set forth in the biological opinion, the Commission therefore recommended that restrictions within the proposed seasonal management area zone prohibit all gillnet and lobster fishing.
The proposed rules noted that this option had been considered but rejected because of concern that displaced fishermen would create a zone of hazardous fishing gear around the established zone.
With regard to this point, the Commission noted that information presented with the Service's proposed rule suggested that relatively few people actually fished in the zone during that season.
It also noted that past experience with management zones requiring gear modifications (e.g., areas in which acoustic deterrents are required to reduce harbor porpoise bycatch) indicate that fishermen often choose to fish outside such zones to avoid having to modify their gear.
The Commission therefore questioned whether a seasonal closure would create either a significant barrier to whales or a major hardship for fishermen.
Finally, the Commission noted that the report of the June 2001 meeting of the Atlantic Large Whale Take Reduction Team suggested that gear design require-ments for special management areas eventually should be applied to all fishing areas.
Noting that time would be needed for manufacturers to produce supplies of new gear and for fishermen to replace existing gear, the Commission therefore recommended that the Service immediately modify the Atlantic Large Whale Take Reduction Plan to set forth a proposed schedule for phasing in requirements for promising riskreduction measures, such as the use of sinking or neutrally buoyant lines between lobster traps and using a single buoy to mark strings of lobster traps and gillnets.
As of the end of 2001 the Service expected to take final action on the various proposed rules early in 2002.
Other Actions to Reduce Entanglements Several other notable contributions also were made to reduce entanglement risks to right whales.
Following the lead of the Massachusetts Division of Marine Fisheries, the Maine Department of Natural Resources and the Rhode Island Division of Fish and Wildlife took steps to develop right whale conservation programs.
During 2001 both states received grants from the National Marine Fisheries Service to work with the fishing industry to heighten awareness of interactions between right whales and fishing gear and to assist in the implementation of research and management actions to reduce right whale entanglement risks.
As a related matter, several New England states joined the National Marine Fisheries Service in organizing a workshop to be held in spring 2002 to examine 21 MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2001 ways to reduce entanglements.
The workshop will involve fishermen, gear manufacturers and distributers, gear technicians, material specialists, and whale biologists.
Its goal will be to identify options for developing new fishing gear and fishing techniques that will minimize or eliminate the risk of serious whale entanglements.
Also during 2001 the Right Whale Research Consortium, an organization of non-governmental research groups including the New England Aquarium, the Center for Coastal Studies, the University of Rhode Island, Woods Hole Oceanographic Institution, and others cooperating on studies of North Atlantic right whales, sponsored a $10,000 award competition for developing equipment or ideas to prevent or mitigate entanglement risks for right whales.
From 20 entrants, five finalists were selected to receive cash awards or prizes for their work on (1) a new design for a breakaway link on gillnet head ropes, (2) equipment to keep trap and net buoys on the seafloor while gear is actively fishing, (3) a gun to attach a tail harness for helping to disentangle whales, (4) a device to cut ropes from entangled whales, and (5) a chemical process to speed the degradation of lost and discarded ropes and nets.
Also in 2001 the Massachusetts Division of Marine Fisheries began funding a project initiated in 1999 by local lobster fishermen to remove lost and illegal lobster traps from Cape Cod Bay.Initially funded as a pilot project by the International Fund for Animal Welfare in 2000 with assistance from the Massachusetts Division of Environmental Law Enforcement, the project involves the removal of any lobster traps that are not legally set between 1 January and 15 May when the number of right whales in the bay peaks.
During this period, lobster traps must meet certain gear specifications (e.g., have at least four traps per buoy, use sinking line between traps, and have a weak link between the buoy and buoy line) and be properly marked.
Any gear not properly marked or otherwise found to be noncompliant is pulled from the water to reduce entanglement threats to whales.
Collisions between Ships and Right Whales The major known cause of human-related right whale deaths and the cause of nearly half of all confirmed right whale deaths since the early 1990s is collisions with ships.
At least two of five dead right whales found in 2001 were killed by ships.
Based on the large size of propeller slashes and the presence of massive bones broken or crushed in examined struck whales, it appears that the vast majority of such deaths are caused by large ships, although calves, in particular, may be killed by smaller vessels.
An analysis of collisions between ships and all species of large whales recently organized by the Commission (see Chapter VIII) found that the majority of serious or lethal injuries was due to ships 80 m (262 ft) or longer.
To reduce ship collision risks to right whales, the National Marine Fisheries Service has relied on the willingness and ability of vessel operators to voluntarily take actions to avoid hitting whales.
To promote this strategy, the Service and cooperating agencies and groups began an intensive aerial survey program in key right whale habitats to find whales and alert vessel operators of whale locations.
They also developed videos, placards, brochures, amendments to maritime guides and publications, and other materials describing the plight of right whales and the need for precautionary measures by vessel operators (e.g., being alert for whales, posting extra watches in right whale habitats, steering clear of sighted whales, and slowing down when right whales are sighted or when in areas where they might be encountered).
Mandatory ship reporting systems also were established in key right whale habitats to ensure that vessel operators are aware of the need to avoid collisions with right whales.
A voluntary approach, however, does not appear to be adequate.
Vessel-related deaths have continued unabated.
In addition, the above-noted review of data regarding whales struck by ships suggests that most whales are not seen before collisions or are seen only at the last moment when it is too late to avoid them.
For large vessels more than 100 m (304 ft) long, a ship traveling at normal operating speed can move a kilometer or more in the time it takes to decide whether to turn and to actually begin turning.
As a result, reliance on voluntary actions by vessel operators to detect and avoid whales may not be sufficient.
Therefore, to examine other measures, a two-year study, funded principally by the International Fund for Animal Welfare and the National Marine Fisheries Service, was initiated in 1999 to identify new measures to reduce ship collision risks.
Recent developments regarding these efforts are discussed below.
Chapter III Species of Special Concern Figure 5.
Adult female right whale #1160, accompanied by her calf, is shown in the upper photograph, taken off Georgia on 29 January 2001, shortly after being struck by a ship.
Resulting propeller slashes are barely visible (photograph by Alicia Windham-Reid).
Wounds are clearly visible in the lower photograph, taken off South Carolina on 26 February 2001 (photograph courtesy of William McClellan).
Early Warning Systems Two aerial survey programs have been established to alert vessel operators to right whale sighting locations.
One, started in the winter of 1993� 1994, covers the calving grounds off Florida and Georgia, and the other, begun in 1996, covers feeding grounds off New England.
Whale sightings, along with advice to use caution when transiting near sighting locations, are relayed to vessels within minutes to hours of the time sightings are made.
This information is disseminated via the Coast Guard's broadcast notice to mariners, voice radio, NAVTEX (a telex communication system aboard most large vessels), messages sent to ships through two mandatory ship reporting systems (see below), pager links with port pilots, and other means.
Photographs and observations of whales from these surveys also provide one of the most important means of detecting entangled whales and monitoring the status of the population.
In the southeastern United States, surveys are flown only during the December-to-March calving season.
Weather permitting, planes fly daily over the center of the calving grounds near the Florida-Georgia border, and less frequently in peripheral areas.
The flights are funded mainly by the Army Corps of Engineers, the Coast Guard, the Navy, the National Marine Fisheries Service, the Florida Fish and Wildlife Conservation Commission, and the Georgia Department of Natural Resources.
The survey and sighting relay network requires extensive coordination and involves staff from the New England Aquarium, the Georgia Department of Natural Resources, the Florida Marine Research Institute, the Navy's Fleet Area Control and Surveillance Facility, and the Coast Guard.
During 2001 combined survey and sighting efforts documented 30 calves, the highest number on record, and more than 500 sightings of one or more animals, also a record high.
On five occasions, aerial observers saw ships heading directly toward whales and radioed the ship.
In one case a fast-moving container ship bearing down on a mother/calf pair began to turn away when contacted, but then turned back directly toward the animals.
When within about one ship's length of the pair, both dived and were next seen a few moments later astern of the ship just outside the ship's wake.
Both were just below the surface and swimming at a rapid pace away from the ship.
Neither appeared injured.
In another case, the ship slowed to 10 knots and came within about 200 m (604 ft) of a whale when it dived, altered its course, and resurfaced behind the vessel.
In the other cases, the ships turned or slowed to avoid the whales and came no closer than a half mile (0.8 km) of the whales, and the whales showed no apparent response to the ships.
As noted above, survey teams also photographed an adult female right whale (accompanied by a calf) that sustained a serious but non-lethal propeller wound in the calving area in late January (Fig. 5).
The northeastern program covers a much larger geographic area that extends farther offshore.
Survey flights occur daily between March and June (weather permitting) and periodically at other times of the year.
The greatest effort is concentrated in Cape Cod Bay in late winter and spring and in the Great South Channel in spring.
The surveys are funded mainly by the National Marine Fisheries Service and the Coast Guard although the Massachusetts Environmental Trust and 23 MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2001 the State of Massachusetts have also contributed significantly in some years.
The survey work is carried out by the Service, the Center for Coastal Studies, and the Massachusetts Division of Fisheries.
In 2001 more than 500 right whale sightings were recorded in the northeast.
In addition to providing sighting locations for mariners, survey teams detected entangled whales, provided sightings that triggered several whale alerts to fishermen about the location of right whale feeding aggregations, detected an additional calf not recorded by surveys in the calving grounds, and resighted two whales that had not been seen for over six years and were thought to have died.
Mandatory Ship Reporting Systems In July 1999 the Coast Guard and the National Marine Fisheries Service jointly implemented two mandatory ship reporting systems approved by the International Maritime Organization at the request of the United States to help protect right whales.
One is in the core of the southeastern U.S. calving grounds and the other covers major feeding grounds off Massachusetts (see Fig. 1).
Within these areas, motorized vessels 300 gross tons or greater must contact a shore station upon entering the area to obtain information on right whales.
Messages are automatically sent by a satellite communication system to reporting ships to advise them of the most recent right whale sighting locations, the need for caution to avoid whales, and the availability of related information.
Reporting vessels also must provide information on their destination, route, and speed to help monitor vessel traffic and collision risks in the reporting areas.
Interim rules for the two reporting systems, published by the Coast Guard in 1999, were adopted as final on 20 November 2001 with minor changes concerning information vessels must report.
Although compliance with the reporting requirements has been disappointing, there were some signs of improvement late in 2001.
Compared to monthly ship arrivals in area ports, overall compliance for the two areas combined from July 1999 through December 2001 was 49 percent.
In the southeastern calving grounds, where reporting is required only from midNovember through mid-April, the compliance rate was 44 percent for the winter of 1999� 2000 and 37 percent for the winter of 20002001.
Compliance during the first two months of the 20012002 season (November and December 2001) was 45 percent.
For the northern area, which is in effect year-round, the compliance rate was 58 percent in 1999, 62 percent in 2000, and 51 percent in 2001.
In part, low compliance may have been due to incorrect reporting instructions in some mariner publications, which were corrected in October 2001.
Perhaps related to this change, reporting rates in the northern area increased from 46 percent in September 2001 to 67 and 73 percent in November and December, respectively.
To improve compliance, the National Marine Fisheries Service has been sending letters describing ship reporting requirements to owners, agents, and captains of vessels that failed to comply.
When compliance failed to improve, the southeastern right whale implementation team wrote to the Coast Guard on 31 January 2001 expressing concern and requesting increased enforcement effort.
In response, the Coast Guard agreed to begin issuing warnings to owners of noncompliant vessels and eventually to impose civil penalties if noncompliance continues.
To evaluate risks of collisions between vessels and whales the National Marine Fisheries Service contracted with the Florida Marine Research Institute to create a geographic information system for archiving reports by ships and to prepare a summary report analyzing that data.
A final report by staff of the Service, the Institute, and the Coast Guard analyzing data available through July 2000 is expected to be completed early in 2002.
The report will include charts depicting reported vessel traffic routes in both areas, data on vessel speeds at the time of entry into the areas, and other information.
Preliminary results suggest that reported ship speeds in the two areas ranged from 5 to 25 knots and that more than half of the vessels were traveling at 14 knots or less.
About three-fourths of the vessels entering the southeastern area used speeds of 18 knots or less and about three-fourths of those entering the northeastern area were traveling at 16 knots or less.
Report on Recommended Measures to Reduce Ship Strikes In 1999 a study was initiated to evaluate potential measures to reduce collisions between ships and right whales.
The study, funded mainly by the International Fund for Animal Welfare and the National Marine Fisheries Service with additional funding from the Marine Mammal Commission and the Georgia Department of Natural Resources, resulted from recommendations by the Marine Mammal Commission to the Service for a project to evaluate voluntary measures that shipping companies might take to avoid hitting 24 Chapter III Species of Special Concern right whales.
The study was conducted under the aegis of the two regional implementation teams and in consultation with representatives of major shipping companies and port authorities along the U.S. East Coast.
During the course of the study, more than 28 workshops and meetings were held with shipping industry representatives and government officials to consider information on vessel-related right whale deaths and possible mitigation measures.
Included in these meetings was a workshop held on 10 April 2001 at the Coast Guard Academy in New London, Connecticut, that brought together more than 100 officials from shipping organizations, government agencies, and environmental groups.
Discussion of mitigation measures quickly focused on two fundamental variables: vessel routes and vessel speeds.
It also was apparent that application of those measures would have to differ in different areas because of variations in geography, vessel traffic, and right whale occurrence.
For example, in some areas routing measures might include ad hoc measures to avoid temporary, unpredictable whale feeding aggregations discovered by aerial survey teams, whereas in other areas, it may be more appropriate to establish seasonal or permanent routes to minimize travel distances through right whale critical habitats, depending on local bathymetry and right whale use patterns.
During the discussion, it was pointed out that any such measures must not compromise navigation safety or general protection of the marine environment.
To assist in the study, a representative of the Marine Mammal Commission presented findings of the above-mentioned review of collisions between ships and whales at several meetings held during the course of the study.
Among other things, that review suggested that the risk of serious and lethal injuries to whales declined sharply at speeds below 14 knots and may approach negligible levels at speeds of 10 knots or less.
Accordingly, it concluded that reducing speeds to between 10 and 13 knots could be an appropriate mitigation measure in situations where risks of collisions with whales are an important concern.
In August 2001 a study report (see Russell et al. 2001, Appendix C) was submitted to the National Marine Fisheries Service.
In part, the report recommended various routing and speed measures for vessels 65 ft (19.8 m) or longer.
Because migrating whales are believed to travel close to shore, it recommended seasonal 10-knot speed limits within 20 nmi (37 km) of major port entrances between southern New England and northern Georgia during migratory periods.
For the calving grounds, it recommended a seasonal 10-knot speed limit within about 25 nmi (46.2 km) of the northeastern Florida and southern Georgia coasts, and that a study be done to determine if new mandatory traffic lanes for three area ports could help reduce travel through areas where whales are seen most often.
For feeding grounds off Massachusetts, it recommended a combination of measures: requiring vessel traffic to follow existing recommended travel lanes through the Great South Channel; a seasonal 10-knot speed limit for a segment of those lanes; and a dynamic management system for imposing short-term 10-knot speed limits in other segments of those lanes when groups of whales are observed feeding.
In the fall of 2001 the study also was presented to the two regional implementation teams.
The southeastern team considered the report's recommendations for the calving area at its meeting on 2425 September 2001 in Fernandina Beach, Florida.
The team then wrote to the Service on 18 October 2001 to convey its views.
It noted that the authors had done a commendable job of soliciting views from constituent groups, consolidating information on the various issues, and formulating recommendations for potential management options.
It also recommended unanimously that the actions identified in the report be further considered after certain additional studies are undertaken.
The additional studies include economic analyses of route and speed measures, an assessment of the likelihood that ships would call at ports outside the calving area due to new restrictions, a risk assessment to determine which recommended measures would offer the greatest protection to whales, and a port access study, which is a prerequisite for any action to establish new vessel traffic requirements.
With regard to economic impacts, a preliminary analysis of report recommendations was presented to the team during its meeting that suggested that overall economic impacts of the measures would be minor but would have the greatest effect on cruise ships and container ships.
Several team members, however, felt that the further analyses mentioned above were needed to adequately assess potential costs.
The northeastern implementation team considered the report at its meeting on 24 October 2001, but as of 25 MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2001 the end of 2001 it had not yet conveyed its views to the Service.
As of the end of 2001 the Service had not yet announced what action it would take with regard to the report and its recommendations.
National Whale Conservation Fund As described in the previous annual report, the National Fish and Wildlife Foundation recently established the National Whale Conservation Fund to help obtain public and private contributions for conserving whale populations in U.S. waters.
Created in response to a 1999 directive by Congress, which later appropriated $250,000 in seed money, the Fund is to be administered in consultation with both the Marine Mammal Commission and the National Marine Fisheries Service.
Its purpose is to support of research, management, conservation, and education/outreach activities related to the conservation and recovery of whales, particularly those that are most endangered.
During 2001 substantial progress was made to develop the Fund.
Among other things, a manager was hired by the Foundation, a council was appointed to oversee Fund development, and an initial grant was made to the Center for Coastal Studies to supplement support for work to disentangle right whales and other large whales found entangled along the U.S. East Coast during 2001.
During 2001 Center staff responded to five entanglement reports, including three humpback whales and two right whales.
Two humpback whales and one right whale were successfully disentangled, efforts to remove gear from one right whale were unsuccessful and the whale is thought to have died, and efforts to remove gear from one humpback whale were also unsuccessful but the whale subsequently shed the gear by itself.
Although fundraising efforts were set back substantially by economic repercussions from the terrorist attacks of 11 September, at the end of 2001 a request for proposals was issued for the Fund's second grantmaking cycle.
Right Whale Litigation Litigation continued to play a role during 2001 in directing state and federal actions designed to avoid the taking of right whales.
Two lawsuits filed in 2000 by environmental groups against the Secretary of Commerce and other officials (Humane Society of the United States v. Evans and Conservation Law Foundation v. Evans) prompted the National Marine Fisheries Service to take certain steps to address fishery interactions.
As discussed above, these included the preparation of four new biological opinions on fisheries that may affect rights whales and the adoption of rules for seasonal and dynamic management measures in areas used by right whales.
The plaintiffs in these cases, which were subsequently consolidated into a single case, sought to compel the Service to strengthen its fishery-related regulations to reduce the taking of right whales incidental to commercial fishing operations.
They alleged that the Service had violated the Endangered Species Act and the Marine Mammal Protection Act by failing to implement fishery management plans that were not likely to jeopardize the continued existence of right whales and by not implementing effective take reduction plans to eliminate taking incidental to commercial fishing operations.
Among other things, the plaintiffs asked the court to compel the Service to issue emergency regulations mandating modifications in lobster and other fishing gear and to restrict or completely close fisheries in areas where right whales are known to aggregate.
They also asked the court to require the Service to convene a ship-strike take reduction team to develop an effective take reduction plan that would meet statutory requirements.
On 4 May 2000, before the suits were filed, the Service determined that new biological opinions and a reassessment of its previous no jeopardy determination were needed for right whales.
Accordingly, the Service developed and, on 14 June 2001, issued a new biological opinion.
Upon issuing the opinion, the federal defendants filed a motion to have the case dismissed on grounds that it was moot.
The plaintiffs, however, did not believe that the new opinion adequately addressed the issues before the court and opposed the motion.
In response, the court stayed its consideration of the matter until the regulations called for in the opinion had been developed.
As noted above, in early October 2001 the Service published proposed rules addressing two of the areas of concern identified in the biological opinion and an advance notice of proposed rulemaking for a third area.
These notices covered issues relating to seasonal area management, dynamic area management, and gear modifications.
Final rules were transmitted by the Service on 31 December 2001 for publication in the Federal Register.
The Commission understands that, 26 Chapter III Species of Special Concern based upon the issuance of these rules, the defendants intend to seek dismissal of the case early in 2002.
As described in the Commission's previous annual reports, a separate lawsuit was filed against the Massachusetts Executive Office of Environmental Affairs by Richard "Max" Strahan in April 1995 alleging four separate violations of the Endangered Species and Marine Mammal Protection Acts concerning right whales by Massachusetts officials (Strahan v. Durand).
In 1996 the court ruled that the plaintiff had demonstrated a sufficient likelihood that endangered whales are periodically taken by entanglement in gillnets and lobster gear in waters regulated by the state and that no permit authorizing such incidental taking had been issued by the National Marine Fisheries Service.
The court therefore ordered the defendants to apply to the National Marine Fisheries Service to obtain an incidental take authorization for right whales under the Marine Mammal Protection Act.
The court also ordered the state to develop and submit a proposal to restrict, modify, or eliminate the use of fixed fishing gear in coastal waters of Massachusetts listed as right whale critical habitat.
In 1997 the U.S. Court of Appeals upheld the lower court's decision, with one exception.
The appellate court ruled that Massachusetts was not required to apply for an incidental take authorization under the Marine Mammal Protection Act.
Although Massachusetts sought review of this decision by the U.S. Supreme Court, the Court chose not to hear the case.
Settlement of the case was reached on 26 April 2001 under an agreement signed by Massachusetts state officials, the Conservation Law Foundation, which had intervened in the case as a plaintiff, and the Massachusetts Lobstermen's Association, which had intervened as a defendant.
Under the terms of the settlement, the parties agreed that, subject to certain exceptions, dynamic gillnet regulations would be implemented, temporarily prohibiting gillnet gear from being used when an aggregation of right whales is present in Cape Cod Bay during the period between 15 May and 31 December of each year.
This prohibition will become effective within 72 hours of the first verified sighting of a whale aggregation consisting of three or more whales and is to remain in effect until all right whales have left the bay.
The settlement also sets out gear requirements for lobster fishing and prohibits the use of floating groundlines.
Under the agreement, the state may continue to issue experimental fishery permits to encourage the development and use of alternative lobster fishing gear that may be more effective in preventing the taking of right whales.
North Pacific Right Whale (Eubalaena japonica) The North Pacific right whale is one of three right whale species that were severely depleted by commercial whaling.
A recent analysis of historical whaling records suggests that between 26,500 and 37,000 North Pacific right whales were killed between 1839 and 1909, and that between 21,000 and 30,000 were killed during the 1840s alone.
The total number of North Pacific right whales still surviving is probably in the low hundreds.
When compared with the North Atlantic right whale, which survives as a single population numbering about 300 whales, it is uncertain which of these two right whale species is the more endangered.
However, there is no doubt that they are the two most endangered large whale species in the world.
Although both are considered "endangered" under the Endangered Species Act, following an earlier taxonomic scheme that classified all Northern Hemisphere right whales as members of a single species (see discussion earlier in this chapter under North Atlantic right whales), North Atlantic and North Pacific right whales are presently lumped together as "northern right whales" on the Act's list of endangered and threatened species.
North Pacific right whales are thought to be divided into two populations -- one in the western North Pacific and the other in the eastern North Pacific.
In summer, the western stock feeds in the Okhotsk Sea and along the Kuril Islands off eastern Russia.
Although its winter distribution is unknown, the population's winter calving grounds are believed to occur somewhere off Southeast Asia or perhaps in deep water in the western North Pacific.
A reliable abundance estimate for the western stock is not currently available.
A recent analysis of data from a Japanese whale survey off eastern Russia between 1989 and 1992 produced a preliminary regional abundance estimate of 922 whales (95 percent confidence interval, 4042,108), but that estimate was based on sightings of only about 30 right whales, some of which may have 27 MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2001 been resightings of the same individuals.
Based on sighting records for the past 30 years, a population size in the low hundreds, at most, seems likely.
Whatever the current number, it would have been substantially larger had it not been for an episode of illegal whaling between 1967 and 1970.
During those years Soviet whalers killed about 135 right whales on the population's summer feeding grounds.
The eastern North Pacific population is far more severely depleted than the western population.
It may number only a few tens of whales, making it the most endangered marine mammal population in U.S. waters.
Early in the 1960s the population apparently numbered in the low hundreds and was recovering slowly from heavy whaling in the mid- to late 1800s.
Between 1963 and 1967, however, Soviet whalers illegally took more than 350 right whales in the southeastern Bering Sea and the Gulf of Alaska.
Since then, sightings in the eastern North Pacific have been very rare and there have been no confirmed reports of calves.
Each summer since 1996 a few right whales have been seen in the southeastern Bering Sea about 200 miles north of Unimak Pass.
The sightings include three or four whales in 1996, four or five in 1997, five or six in 1998, six or seven in 1999, and 13 in 2000.
In 2001 groups of two and three whales were seen in the same area.
These sightings apparently reflect the discovery of a preferred feeding grounds for remnants of the eastern North Pacific population.
The National Marine Fisheries Service is responsible for right whale research and management activities and, since 1996, most sightings have been made during aerial and shipboard surveys organized by the Service to study right whales using the southeastern Bering Sea in summer.
The surveys have sought to photo-identify and collect biopsy samples from as many individual right whales as possible.
Photographs collected through 2001 reveal that at least 14 individuals have been in the groups sighted.
Biopsy samples have been collected from six whales and genetic studies revealed that all were males.
Although none of the sightings off Alaska has included calves, reports of courtship behavior suggest that a potential for reproduction still exists.
Critical Habitat Petition The reported right whale sightings in the southeastern Bering Sea between 1997 and 1999 prompted the Center for Biological Diversity to petition the National Marine Fisheries Service in October 2000 to designate a large portion of the southeastern Bering Sea as a right whale critical habitat.
The petition sought to designate waters between 45 and 100 m deep along the outer edge of the continental shelf, extending as a band about 800 km (432 nmi) northwest from the eastern Aleutian Islands.
The Endangered Species Act provides for such designations when it is determined that a specific geographic area includes physical or biological features that are essential for the conservation of a listed species and when special management needs may exist.
Critical habitat designation does not necessarily trigger new regulatory measures, but it does clarify and highlight the obligations of federal agencies to consult with the Service on any actions they may take or authorize that could modify the area or adversely affect the listed species.
To help evaluate the merits of the proposed action, the Service published a Federal Register notice on 1 July 2001 requesting comments on the petition.
The Marine Mammal Commission, in consultation with its Committee of Scientific Advisors, responded to the Service on 11 July 2001.
It noted that although recent right whale sightings in the area are sparse, the repeated summer sightings since 1996, along with historical whaling records showing that right whales were once abundant in the area, provide a reasonable basis for concluding that the petitioned area contains features essential to the population's survival.
Based on experience with North Atlantic right whales, the Commission also noted that collisions with ships and entanglement in commercial fishing gear could represent significant conservation issues for North Pacific right whales.
It therefore recommended that the Service proceed with designating the area as critical habitat with a view toward modifying its boundaries at a future date if warranted by better data on the distribution and habitat-use patterns of the whales.
To improve information in this regard, the Commission recommended that surveys to photograph and biopsy right whales in the southeastern Bering Sea be continued.
If steps were not already planned to do so, the Commission also recommended that studies be initiated to (1) use satellite tags to track right whale movements and habitat-use patterns in the southeastern Bering Sea, (2) analyze available biopsy samples from 28 Chapter III Species of Special Concern the southeastern Bering Sea and the western North Pacific to assess genetically whether whales from the two areas comprise separate stocks, and (3) examine recent photographs of North Pacific right whales to look for scars that might indicate interactions with fishing gear or ships.
The Commission also recommended that the Service evaluate the extent to which potentially hazardous gillnet or trap fishing gear is present in the petitioned area during seasons when right whales are present.
The Service replied to the Commission by letter of 18 September 2001 noting that it was in the process of reviewing comments and other information bearing on the petition.
With respect to the research activities recommended by the Commission, the Service noted that right whale surveys in the southeastern Bering Sea would be continued and expanded as funding permits, although no surveys were planned in the western North Pacific.
It also advised that it planned to use satellite tags to track right whales, but not until it reviewed concerns raised by the Scientific Committee of the International Whaling Commission on the effects of tags implanted in the past on North Atlantic right whales.
Regarding genetic analyses, the Service noted that, although genetic data strongly support the conclusion that North Atlantic and North Pacific right whales are separate species, the number of North Pacific right whales sampled is likely too small to distinguish between eastern and western stocks, and such studies therefore are not currently planned.
Finally, the Service noted that photographs of the North Pacific right whales show no evidence of scars from either ships or fishing gear.
As of the end of 2001 the Service had not yet announced a decision on whether to proceed with the petition to designate critical habitat for North Pacific right whales.
Marine Mammal Commission Review During the annual meeting of the Marine Mammal Commission and its Committee of Scientific Advisors, held in Anchorage, Alaska, on 1416 November 2001, representatives of the Service reviewed information on its North Pacific right whale research and management plans for 2002.
In addition to actions noted above, the Service advised that a draft recovery plan for North Pacific right whales was being prepared and would be available for review in 2002.
It also noted that it was planning to expand right whale survey efforts in the southeastern Bering Sea.
Planned work includes surveying an expanded area using hydrophones to locate and photograph right whales, sampling oceanographic conditions to assess ecological factors related to right whale distribution, and possibly using satellite tags to track right whale movements.
Based on this information, the Commission, in consultation with its Committee of Scientific Advisors, wrote to the Service on 27 December 2001 providing further comments and recommendations.
The Commission noted that it was pleased to learn that a recovery plan for North Pacific right whales was being prepared and it recommended that the Service complete both the recovery plan and the evaluation of the critical habitat petition as soon as possible.
The Commission also noted that all of the identified research efforts seemed essential and recommended that funding to accomplish them be provided in 2002.
Noting the possible deferral of work using satellite tags pending a review of International Whaling Commission concerns about the effects of such tags on whales, the Commission stated that it did not believe available information on tag effects warranted a deferral of this work.
It noted that it was aware of no mortalities resulting from the tagging of large whales and that, in its view, the risk of being unable to protect right whales and their habitats because it is not known what areas they use is far greater than the risk of serious tagging effects.
In addition, it noted that recent advancements, such as the use of antibiotics on tags, have reduced tagging risks to animals.
Finally, the Commission recommended that, if it was not already being done, the Service update the listing of "northern right whales" on the List of Endangered and Threatened Species of Wildlife under the Endangered Species Act.
It noted that the list should reflect the current understanding that North Pacific and North Atlantic right whales constitute separate species, that both stocks are endangered, and that the North Pacific right whale is believed to be divided into separate eastern and western stocks.
29 MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2001 Humpback Whales in Alaska (Megaptera novaeangliae) Humpback whales occur in all the worlds's oceans.
Although they usually inhabit coastal waters and feed mainly on krill and small schooling fish (e.g., capelin, anchovy, herring, walleye pollock, mackerel, and sand lance), humpback whales also occur in the open ocean -- especially when migrating between summer feeding grounds and winter calving grounds.
Like some other large whale species, humpback whales appear to fast during the calving season (and perhaps also during their migration), living off fat reserves that accumulate in their blubber during the feeding season.
Because their feeding grounds occur in temperate and polar latitudes and their calving grounds are almost always in the Tropics, the distance traveled by migrating humpback whales can be among the longest of any mammal on earth.
In this regard, a recent study documented an individual humpback whale feeding off Antarctica that was subsequently resighted on its calving grounds at least 8,400 km (5,220 mi) away along the west coast of Central America.
Because of the reversal of seasons in the Northern and Southern Hemispheres, the timing of migrations by humpback whale populations in the two hemispheres is always six months out of phase with one another.
As a result, although it has been generally believed that members of northern and southern populations rarely, if ever, interact with each other, recent findings reveal that their tropical calving habitats do, in some cases, overlap geographically.
Thus, opportunities for interbreeding may be somewhat greater than previously thought.
Some 13 stocks of humpback whales are currently recognized worldwide, all of which were severely depleted by commercial whaling.
Although many, if not most, populations are showing encouraging signs of recovery, the species is still listed as endangered throughout its range under the Endangered Species Act.
Three stocks of humpback whales occur in the North Pacific Ocean, one of which -- the central North Pacific stock -- migrates annually between winter calving grounds in Hawaii and summer feeding grounds located principally along the Gulf of Alaska.
The central stock appears to be increasing in size.
Its most recent abundance estimate (based on data from the early 1990s) is about 4,000 whales.
Preferred feeding grounds for the central North Pacific stock include the Alexander Archipelago in southeastern Alaska and British Columbia, Prince William Sound, the Kodiak Island area, and the eastern Aleutian Islands.
With further research, it seems likely that other important feeding areas, possibly including pelagic waters in the Gulf of Alaska and the Bering Sea, could be identified.
Although a few whales move among different feeding areas within and between years, the vast majority return to the same feeding grounds year after year.
For example, a recent study of humpback whale photographs taken between 1990 and 1993 identified 287 individuals using the southeastern Alaska feeding area.
A review of more than 300 photographs taken during that period at other feeding areas revealed that only four of those whales also were seen elsewhere in Alaska and British Columbia.
Preliminary results of ongoing research by scientists with the National Marine Fisheries Service using a large data set of photo-identified whales appear consistent with these findings.
This strong site fidelity to feeding grounds is thought to be due to ingrained migratory patterns imparted to calves by their mothers during the first year of life, when mother/calf pairs remain together constantly.
Between 1985 and 1992, 648 individual humpback whales were identified from photographs taken in southeastern Alaska.
Although such data can provide a good basis for estimating the number of whales using specific feeding grounds, data to develop reliable abundance estimates for all feeding grounds in Alaska currently are not available.` With commercial hunting of humpback whales banned, the species' greatest sources of human-related injury and death are now entanglement in commercial fishing gear and collisions with ships.
However, more subtle effects on behavior and habitat-use patterns also are possible as a result of disturbance by vessel traffic, anthropogenic sources of noise, and effects of pollution from agricultural runoff.
Humpback whales are a major focus for commercial whale-watching operations in both Alaska and Hawaii and also may be affected if there is a proliferation of high-speed ferries, as is being considered for coastal waters of both states.
Alaska Whale-Watching Regulations The National Marine Fisheries Service has lead responsibility for the recovery of humpback whales 30 Chapter III Species of Special Concern under both the Marine Mammal Protection Act and the Endangered Species Act.
On 26 June 2000, the Service published a Federal Register notice proposing rules for vessels approaching humpback whales in Alaska.
The proposal, developed mainly to protect humpback whales from harassment and collisions by whalewatching vessels, called for prohibiting vessel approaches closer than 200 yd (182.9 m) to humpback whales in all waters off Alaska.
At the time of the proposal, whale-watching in Alaska was unregulated except in Glacier Bay National Park, where the National Park Service prohibits approaches closer than 1/4 mi (440 yd [402.3 m]).
Although the National Marine Fisheries Service adopted rules in the 1980s prohibiting vessel approaches closer than 100 yd (91.4 m) to humpback whales in Hawaii, the Service noted that a 200-yd limit in Alaska seemed warranted because of the high degree of site fidelity among feeding humpback whales and because whales could be hemmed in by whale-watching vessels in the confined bays, coves, and inlets that often characterize their habitat in Alaska.
The Commission commented to the Service in support of the proposed rule on 26 October 2000.
In its letter, however, the Commission also recommended that the rule include a vessel speed limit of between 10 and 13 knots within fixed distances around whales to minimize collision risks.
In support of its recommendation, the Commission provided preliminary results of a review on collisions between ships and whales (see Chapter VIII and Laist et al. 2001 in Appendix C).
Based on that review, it noted that such collisions occurred more often than previously thought and that whale-watching boats had been involved in numerous reported collisions.
It also noted that speed was an apparent factor in collisions causing serious or fatal injuries and that whale-watching guidelines recently adopted for New England waters recommend decreasing speed limits within concentric circles of decreasing diameter around whales.
After considering comments on its proposal, the Service published a final rule in the Federal Register on 31 May 2001 establishing a 100-yd approach limit.
The preamble explained that a 100-yd, rather than a 200-yd, approach limit had been adopted to be consistent with the rules already in effect for Hawaii.
In response to comments urging the use of vessel speed limits near whales, the Service added a measure requir- ing that vessels operate "at slow, safe speed when near a whale."
No explanation was given as to what constituted either "slow, safe speed" or being "near a whale."
Regarding the Commission's recommendation for speed limits of between 10 and 13 knots, the Service stated that specific speed limits were not adopted because it believed that they were neither enforceable nor practical.
Although the rationale for those conclusions was not provided, the preamble stated that some vessels had "clutch-in speeds" greater than 10 knots, implying that they could not operate safely at speeds between 10 and 14 knots.
Clutch-in speed is the slowest speed a vessel can travel without having to glide with the engine disengaged After reviewing the final rule, the Commission was concerned that the Service's rationale for rejecting specific speed limits was not well founded and that the adopted rule would be less effective and less enforceable than the Commission's recommended approach.
In addition, as noted in the North Atlantic right whale section earlier in this chapter, specific speed limits of 10 to 13 knots are under consideration to protect right whales along the U.S. East Coast, and the Commission was concerned that the precedent set by the rule would seriously constrain options to protect that species.
The Commission therefore wrote to the Service on 18 June 2001 recommending that the rule be revised to set forth specific speed limits within explicit distances around whales.With regard to Service concerns about the practicality of specific speed limits, the Commission questioned whether any whale-watching vessels had clutchin speeds greater than 10 to 13 knots.
It also noted its understanding that very few vessels had such high clutch-in speeds and those that did routinely operated at slower speeds by engaging and disengaging their engines.
The Commission therefore asked the Service for a list of vessel types with clutch-in speeds of between 10 and 13 knots and information as to why they could not operate safely at slower speeds.
With regard to enforcement, the Commission noted that a specific speed limit was needed to provide vessel operators with clear guidance as to what constituted a slow safe speed when near whales.
It also asked for an explanation as to why the adopted measure's ambiguous speed and distance standards would be easier to enforce than the specific speed and distance limits recommended by the Commission.
31 MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2001 The Service responded to the Commission by letter on 16 October 2001.
It also provided information on the matter during the Commission's annual meeting on 1618 November 2001 in Anchorage, Alaska.
The Service stated that it did not plan to revise its rule as recommended by the Commission because of continuing concerns about practicality and enforcement.
It noted that, although vessels with clutch-in speeds of 10 to 13 knots could operate safely at slower speeds, prolonged travel at those speeds could put undue mechanical stress on the vessel.
It also noted that, in areas of rapid current, some vessels traveling with the current may be unable to maintain safe steerage at speeds of 10 to 13 knots over the ground.
With regard to enforcement, no explanation was provided as to why the adopted rule would be easier to enforce than one with specific speed and distance provisions; however, the Service stated that most vessel operators in Alaska would likely interpret "slow, safe speed" as 15 knots or less.
It also said that, given the limits of speed and range-detecting technology, enforcement officers could not determine precisely how fast a vessel was traveling or when it was within a set distance greater than 350 feet (106.7 m) from a whale.
After considering this information, the Commission remained concerned that the Service's speed provision was too vague to be effective and that the rationale for not using specific speed and distance standards was questionable.
On 27 December 2001 the Commission therefore again wrote to the Service on the matter.
In the absence of survey data to support the Service's assertion that most vessel operators would consider 15 knots or less to be a slow, safe speed, the Commission observed that such a conclusion seemed speculative.
It also noted that speeds of 14 and 15 knots, which apparently meet the Service's standard for "slow, safe speed," did not appear to be slow enough to reduce serious injury or mortality risks to whales based on available data.
Moreover, the Commission commented that, as the rule was written, it seemed doubtful that courts could levy fines against a vessel operator who stated that they considered speeds greater than 15 knots to be slow and safe enough for whales.
The Commission also noted that it had not yet received the requested list of vessel types with clutch-in speeds greater than 10 knots that might be affected by a specific speed limit, but that it continued to believe that very few vessels, and no whale-watching vessels, would fit this category.
It also noted that, given distances of a few miles or less that vessels might need to travel at reduced speed to comply with these regulations, potential wear on engines would likely be insignificant compared with that which is routinely experienced when ships slow to enter port or avoid other navigation hazards.
With regard to vessel safety problems posed by using slow speeds in areas of high current, the Commission agreed that such situations were a potential concern.
To address this point, the Commission noted that specific speed limits could be required subject to an exemption in situations where they could compromise vessel or human safety.
This would afford vessel operators the flexibility needed to operate safely in those occasional cases where slow speed could be hazardous.
In this regard, the Commission commented that enforcement officers should have no more difficulty judging when vessel safety needs override a specific speed limit than they would judging what constitutes "slow, safe speed" under current regulations.
Finally, the Commission noted that the public did not have a chance to comment on the speed restriction adopted by the Service in its final rules.
Therefore, the Commission recommended that the Service develop and seek public comment on a proposed rule to modify the current Alaska humpback whale approach rule.
Specifically, it recommended that the requirement for using "slow, safe speed when near a whale" be replaced by one requiring vessels to travel at 12 knots or less, unless inconsistent with vessel or human safety, when within a half mile (0.8 km) of any humpback whale in Alaska.
With regard to the applicable distance around a whale, the Commission noted that a mile (1.6 km) or more seemed appropriate for open-water areas, but that a half mile may be more appropriate for inland waters where whales tend to feed in southeastern Alaska.
With regard to enforcement, the Commission noted that compliance by commercial whale-watching vessels likely would increase if vessel operators knew that their passengers were aware of the applicable restrictions and to whom violations should be reported.
The Commission therefore recommended that the Service add a provision to require that operators of commercial vessels engaged in whale-watching either provide their customers with flyers or prominently post a placard aboard their vessel identify-ing the approach rules and phone numbers for reporting violations.
32 Chapter III Species of Special Concern Other Alaska Humpback Whales Issues As noted above, the Commission reviewed research and management issues concerning humpback whales in Alaska during its annual meeting on 1618 November 2001.
During that review, two issues in addition to the status of Alaska whale-watching regulations were examined: the preparation of stock assessment reports for humpback whales in Alaska and the reporting of vessel collisions.
Under section 118 of the Marine Mammal Protection Act the National Marine Fisheries Service is required to prepare stock assessments for each marine mammal stock in U.S. waters.
For marine mammals listed as endangered, such as humpback whales, stock assessments must be updated annually.
Among other things, each assessment must estimate the abundance of the relevant stock and calculate its potential biological removal level (PBR).
The latter, calculated by a set formula, is the number of animals that can be removed from a discrete stock of animals (not including natural mortality) while maintaining a high degree of assurance that the stock will continue to increase toward or remain at its optimum sustainable population level.
To help prepare stock assessments, the Service established four regional scientific review groups.
Based on information noted above indicating that whales using different Alaska feeding areas constitute discrete groups, the Alaska Scientific Review Group recommended late in 2000 that the stock assessments for humpback whales in Alaska calculate minimum population estimates and PBRs for each summer feeding area in Alaska.
This approach is already followed for humpback whales in the Gulf of Maine and along the West Coast between California and Washington, and the group noted that this would bring the Alaska humpback whale stock assessments in line with those for other areas.
The Commission considered this recommendation and determined that it had merit.
It concluded that, when there is substantial information to indicate that the loss of a regional group of animals is unlikely to be replaced within a few generations by members of the same species from surrounding areas, that group of animals should be treated as a separate management unit for purposes of preparing stock assessments.
It also believed, however, that subdividing stocks into such groups should be approached cautiously and done only when (1) there is strong information to indicate that members of a group exhibit a high degree of site fidelity and discreteness from other population components, (2) the group represents an ecologically significant part of the regional ecosystem, (3) immigration of conspecifics from other areas is not likely to occur for at least several generations, and (4) their geographic extent comprises a significant part of the population's overall range.
The Commission therefore recommended in its 27 November 2001 letter to the Service that separate abundance estimates and PBRs be developed for welldefined feeding groups of humpback whales in southeastern Alaska, Prince William Sound, and other areas, as information warrants.
During the Commission's annual meeting review, it also was advised of an incident in which a humpback whale was killed by a vessel, possibly a cruise ship, at the mouth of Glacier Bay in July 2001.
The whale, a pregnant female, was among the first whales to be individually identified in southeastern Alaska.
First identified from photographs taken in Glacier Bay in 1975, the whale was subsequently resighted numerous times in both Alaska and Hawaii, providing some of the first evidence of an annual migration between the two areas.
Her death followed a similar event in southeastern Alaska in July 1999 when a humpback whale was killed and caught on the bow of a large cruise ship.
It is uncertain how often such incidents occur; however, they have been reported sporadically throughout the United States to the Service, in the press, and in scientific papers.
As discussed in Chapter VIII, such reports provide an important basis for assessing the frequency of ship strikes, the types of vessels involved, and other related factors.
During its meeting, the Commission was advised that, although the National Park Service requires the reporting of any collisions with whales in Glacier Bay National Park, the National Marine Fisheries Service has no such reporting requirement for lethal or nonlethal collisions with whales in Glacier Bay or any other area.
Noting the importance of such reports to assess their frequency and possible mitigation measures, the Commission therefore recommended in its 27 November 2001 letter that the Service develop a regulation to require that vessel operators report collisions that kill or seriously injure whales to appropriate Service officials.
33 MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2001 34 MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2001 Gray Whale (Eschrichtius robustus) The gray whale, which is now found only in the North Pacific Ocean, is divided into two discrete stocks -- the eastern (or California) stock and the western (or Asian) stock.
The eastern stock migrates between wintering areas off Baja California, Mexico, and summer feeding grounds in the Bering and Chukchi Seas between Alaska and Russia.
The western stock migrates between winter calving areas along the coast of China and summer feeding grounds in the Okhotsk Sea, mainly off the northeastern coast of Sakhalin Island, Russia.
In the mid-1800s and early 1900s commercial whaling severely depleted both stocks.
Because of this overexploitation, gray whales were among the first whale species afforded protection under an international ban on whaling adopted by the League of Nations in the mid-1930s and extended by the 1946 International Convention for the Regulation of Whaling.
Gray whales were listed as endangered throughout their range under the U.S. Endangered Species Conservation Act of 1969, the predecessor to the Endangered Species Act of 1973.
Although certain threats to the population and its habitat remain, the eastern North Pacific gray whale stock has made a substantial recovery and was removed from the endangered species list in June 1994.
Since these international moratoriums entered into force, the western stock, which was reduced to a much lower level, has not recovered and currently may consist of fewer than 100 animals.
The National Marine Fisheries Service is the lead federal agency responsible for the conservation of gray whales.
The Eastern North Pacific Stock The eastern stock of gray whales was thought to have been reduced to a few thousand animals when the ban on commercial whaling of gray whales went into effect.
Over the past 35 years, the National Marine Fisheries Service has conducted 22 surveys to monitor the stock's size and trend.
Survey results from 19971998 indicated a population of about 26,600 whales, a level thought to be within the stock's optimum sustainable population range.
The Service is currently analyzing surveys conducted in 20002001 34 and 20012002 that may indicate a substantial drop in the population.
Since 1994 the Service also has surveyed whales migrating northward to assess calf production.
Results through 1998 indicate that calves have accounted for between 2.6 and 6.5 percent of the population.
This figure dropped to 1.7 percent in 1999 and 1 percent in 2000 and 2001.
Gray Whale Strandings, 19992001 In 1999 and 2000, respectively, 284 and 377 gray whales stranded or were found floating near shore along the west coast of North America from Mexico to Alaska.
Prior to 1999 the annual average was fewer than 40 animals, and the previous record for a single year was 87.
In June 1999 the National Marine Fisheries Service consulted with the Working Group on Marine Mammal Unusual Mortality Events, which declared the strandings an unusual mortality event and provided recommendations to the Service to monitor the extent of the event and investigate its nature.
In 2001 only 21 animals were observed stranded or floating near shore, and the working group determined the unusual mortality event to be over.
Information on the stranding events in 1999 and 2000 and actions taken to investigate the causes are discussed in Chapter VI.
The cause or causes of the events are yet to be determined.
Five-Year Status Review The eastern North Pacific stock of gray whales was removed from the Endangered Species Act list of endangered and threatened wildlife on 16 June 1994.
To help ensure that such delisting actions are prudent, the Act requires that the responsible agency monitor a species' status for at least five years after it is removed from the list.
As discussed in previous annual reports, on 1617 March 1999 the Service convened a workshop to review the results of its five-year research program as well as other information bearing on the status of eastern North Pacific gray whales.
The results and findings of the workshop were summarized in an August 1999 report prepared by the Service.
Participants in the workshop concluded that the eastern North Pacific stock did not meet established criteria for listing as either threatened or endangered and that it should not be relisted under the Act.
The stock continued to increase after delisting from an estimated number of 23,100 whales in 1994 to an estimate of 26,635 (95 percent confidence interval, 21,87832,427) in 19971998 based on winter counts Chapter III Species of Special Concern along the California coast during the stock's southbound migration those years.
Modeling analyses indicate that the stock has increased at an average rate of about 2.5 percent per year since the late 1960s.
Workshop participants recommended that monitoring studies be continued for another five-year period (i.e., 19992004), in part because the stock offers a unique opportunity to assess how a cetacean population responds to natural and anthropogenic influences as it approaches or reaches environmental carrying capacity.
The participants identified and ranked research needs, including, in decreasing order of priority, (1) continued annual surveys of whales migrating southward along the California coast to monitor population size, (2) continued studies of the effects of human activity and development in winter calving and nursing lagoons in Mexico, (3) photogrammetry studies to assess the condition of whales, (4) continued calf counts to assess population productivity, and (5) surveys in the Bering and Chukchi Seas to examine the effects of environ-mental parameters, particularly climate warming, on whale foraging patterns.
On 7 August 2001 the Marine Mammal Commission wrote to the Service to emphasize the working group's advice on research needs and express its concern over the unusual stranding events in 1999 and 2000.
The Commission recommended that the Service (1) formally initiate a second five-year period of monitoring for the eastern North Pacific gray whale and prepare a monitoring plan based on the 1999 workshop's recommendations, (2) review all data pertinent to the unusual strandings in 1999 and 2000 and make a formal declaration regarding the status of the event (which had not yet been declared ended) and complete development of a response plan for similar events in the future, (3) analyze the cumulative effects of mortality and decreased reproduction in 1999 2000, aboriginal hunting, ship strikes, and other humanrelated factors and report the results to the International Whaling Commission, and (4) review current and planned studies of both the eastern and western stocks to ensure that they provide the information necessary to understand the stocks' status and facilitate recovery.
At the Commission's 2001 annual meeting, representatives of the Service reported on studies currently underway at the Southwest Fisheries Science Center to assess the stock's calf production and the 35 physical condition of living gray whales.
As noted above, calf production declined significantly in 1999 and appears to have been poor in 2001.
Photographic comparisons from 1997 to 2000 indicate that an overall reduction in physical condition may have contributed to the unusual stranding events in 1999 and 2000.
Both of these observations are indicative of population stress, perhaps related to the availability of food resources.
The Service also reported that seasonal sea ice cover may affect calf production by limiting the whales' access to important feeding grounds.
Potential Threats to Calving and Nursing Lagoons The eastern North Pacific gray whale population uses a series of coastal bays and lagoons along the western shore of Mexico's Baja California Peninsula for calving and nursing calves.
In 1976 three of the coastal lagoons (San Ignacio, Ojo de Liebre, and Guerrero Negro) were designated by Mexico as the Whale Sanctuary of El Vizcaino.
In 1988 they also were designated as the Vizcaino Biosphere Reserve, part of a United Nations system of internationally significant natural areas, and in 1993 they received further recognition and protection as a Natural World Heritage Site.
In 1994 the Mitsubishi Corporation and the Mexican government proposed the development of a large saltwater evaporation project that could affect the whales' use of two of the stock's most important calving lagoons.
The proposal included construction of a large evaporation facility on the shores of Laguna San Ignacio: 116 square miles (300 sq km) of evaporating ponds, a 1.25-mile-long (2 km) pier, and pumps to siphon 6,000 gallons (22,710 liters) of seawater per second.
Concerns were raised that barge traffic and noise from the facility could disturb and displace calving and nursing whales, and spills of fuel, brine, or other chemicals could pose pollution risks.
In 1995 the Mexican environmental secretariat rejected the proposal on grounds that it was incompatible with the objectives of the biological reserve.
The developers appealed the finding but then withdrew the proposal and announced that they would develop an environmental assessment, which was completed early in 2000.
The assessment concluded that construction and operation of the facility would have no detrimental effects on gray whales.
However, on 3 March 2000 the developers jointly announced that they were canceling the project despite the fact MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2001 that the environmental assessment concluded that the proposed saltworks would not adversely impact the lagoon, the gray whales, or other plant and animal species.
They cited other factors to be considered, including the impact of a project of this magnitude on the integrity of the area as well as public opposition to the project.
At the Commission's 2001 annual meeting, representatives of the National Marine Fisheries Service reported that Sempra Energy and CMS Energy Corporation plan to build a liquid gas terminal in Baja California about 60 mi (96 km) south of the U.S.Mexican border and 12 mi (19.3 km) north of Ensenada.
The project includes a pier of 1,000 ft (305 m) or longer extending out from the coast and directly in the migratory path of the eastern gray whale.
The project is to be completed by 2005.
The Commission intends to monitor the situation as it develops.
Subsistence Take of Gray Whales Native residents in Russia and the United States take gray whales under a subsistence whaling quota from the International Whaling Commission (IWC).
Annual takes between 1994 and 1998 ranged from 42 to 122 whales.
During that period, only two gray whales were taken by Alaska Natives in 1995 and the remainder were taken by Russian hunters.
In May 1995 the Makah Tribal Council of Washington State requested permission from the Departments of Commerce and State to take up to five gray whales annually for ceremonial purposes.
Whaling had been a traditional part of the tribe's way of life for more than 1,000 years until it ceased in the 1920s.
In 1999 the United States and the tribal council (citing its whaling rights under the 1855 Treaty of Neah Bay) requested and the IWC approved the current quota for gray whales.
The quota was established as a five-year block of 620 whales, with no more than 140 whales to be landed in any one year.
Under a subsequent agreement between Russia and the United States, Russia agreed to limit its take to 135 whales and the United States agreed to limit its take to 5 whales.
On 17 October 1997 Rep. Jack Metcalf of Washington and several environmental groups sued the Department of Commerce, challenging the department's actions to promote and authorize whaling by the Makah.
The court found in favor of the defendants (the Department of Commerce), but the 36 plaintiffs appealed the decision to the Ninth Circuit Court of Appeals.
In the spring of 1999 Makah whalers put to sea to renew the tribe's whaling tradition.
Since their initial announcement of intent to resume a gray whale hunt, the Makah's whaling plans have been the focus of sharp criticism and intense protest by people opposed to the killing of whales.
Antiwhaling activists attempted to prevent the hunt in 1999 by running boats between the tribe's whaling canoe and targeted whales.
Several activists were arrested by the Coast Guard.
After one whale was struck a glancing blow by a harpoon but escaped alive, Makah whalers succeeded in killing and landing a gray whale on 17 May 1999.
No more whales were landed by the Makah during 1999.
On 9 June 2000 the Ninth Circuit Court of Appeals overturned one aspect of the previous court ruling, finding that the 1997 environmental assessment on whaling by the Makah Tribe should have been completed before the National Marine Fisheries Service (Department of Commerce) and the Makah tribe entered into a 1996 cooperative agreement on whaling.
The court reasoned that, because the assessment was completed after the 1996 agreement, it may have predisposed the preparers to find that the proposal would not significantly affect the environment.
On 11 August 2000 the Service rescinded its cooperative agreement with the Makah Tribe and subsequently set the 2000 gray whale quota to zero while it developed a new environmental assessment.
On 17 January 2001 the Service published notice in the Federal Register of the availability of a new draft environmental assessment examining the consequences of issuing a quota for gray whales to the Makah for 2001 and 2002.
The draft considered four alternatives: (1) the Service would grant the Makah a quota of five whales per year, targeting only migrating whales, (2) the quota of five whales would allow targeting migrating whales and a limited hunt outside the migrating period, (3) the quota of five whales would be without restrictions, and (4) no quota would be issued.
Public hearings on the draft were held 1 February 2001 in Seattle, Washington.
Alternative 1 was similar to the regime in place in 1999.
The Marine Mammal Commission wrote to the Service on 16 February 2001 to request, as it had in a Chapter III Species of Special Concern 9 October 1997 letter, that the issue of precedence between the 1855 Treaty of Neah Bay and the 1946 International Convention on the Regulation of Whaling be clarified.
The Commission believes that the relationship between the two treaties provides an important context for analyzing the various alternatives, and that the Service's position on this issue needs to be clear and consistent.
With regard to the first alternative, the Commission asked for clarification of how the Service determined the number of allowable strikes and how the Service defined the term "strike."
The Commission disputed the Service's reasoning behind its claim that the granting of this alternative will not set a precedent for other Native groups that may wish to engage in whaling in the future.
With regard to alternative 2, the Commission suggested that confusion could result if potential biological removal assessments were defined as a range, as proposed in this alternative, and noted that the conclusion reached by the Service regarding potential biological removal failed to recognize and account for other forms of humanrelated mortality such as ship strikes or entanglement in fishing gear.
The Commission did not agree with the Service that there would be no effects on the gray whale population under alternative 3, nor did it agree that a decision by the United States to prohibit subsistence whaling could be viewed as being contrary to the underlying IWC action, as the Service has indicated in its analysis of alternative 4.
On 19 July 2001 the Service published notice in the Federal Register of the availability of the final environmental assessment, in which alternative 1 was chosen as the whaling regime.
In a Federal Register notice dated 26 November 2001 the Service announced its intent to conduct an environmental assessment on issuing a quota to the Makah Tribe for the years 20032007.
In a Federal Register notice dated 13 December 2001 the Service announced that a quota of five whales had been issued to the Makah Tribe for the 20012002 season.
The Western North Pacific Stock As recently as the 1970s, the western North Pacific gray whale stock was thought to have been extirpated by whaling activity.
However, a small remnant population is now known to have survived.
Its range extends from the Okhotsk Sea to the South 37 China Sea.
Based on findings from an ongoing U.S.Russia photo-identification project, the total population is thought to number just under 100 individuals.
Because of the very small size of the surviving population and the possibility that fewer than 50 reproductive individuals (including fewer than 20 reproductive females) may remain, the World Conservation Union (IUCN) listed the western gray whale as "critically endangered" in 2000.
Current threats to western gray whales include poaching in the northern Sea of Japan and incidental fisheries-related mortality throughout most of their range, particularly in the extensive coastal net fisheries off southern China.
Substantial nearshore industrialization and ship traffic throughout the population's migratory corridors increase the likelihood of exposure to chemical pollution and ship strikes.
During its 2001 annual meeting, Service representatives informed the Commission of current and planned offshore oil and gas development in the South China Sea and within 20 km of the population's only known feeding ground off the northeastern coast of Sakhalin Island in the Okhotsk Sea.
Anthropogenic activities related to oil and gas exploration, including high-intensity geophysical seismic surveying, drilling operations, increased ship and air traffic, and oil spills, all pose potential threats to this stock of gray whales.
Plans to build piers and barge-docking stations on the gray whale feeding grounds around Sakhalin Island are of particular concern.
In addition, proposed pipelines running the length of the island to the production complex on southern Sakhalin Island may cause the whales to be confined and limit their access to the waters off Piltun Lagoon, the major feeding area for the population.
In 1995 Russian and U.S. scientists initiated a cooperative research program off northeastern Sakhalin Island to monitor the population status of western gray whales.
Funding for the program has come largely from the oil and gas consortia involved in developing the region.
Research findings to date have provided vital new information on the status of the western population and the nature and magnitude of ongoing threats to its survival.
This research has provided valuable information on the stock's reproduction rate, status, and physical health.
MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2001 Mothers with calves and pregnant females have been identified in the study area annually and are among the most frequently sighted individuals.
Eighteen calves were observed on the feeding grounds between 1995 and 2000, and six more were observed in 2001.
Sixty-seven percent of the 18 calves identified between 1995 and 2000 have not been resighted after the year of their birth.
These findings suggest that calf survivorship within the first year is low, possibly as low as 33 percent.
Reproductive females, both lactating and pregnant, have especially high energetic demands, making it imperative that they have unimpeded access to their feeding grounds.
The pronounced seasonal site fidelity to their feeding grounds off northeastern Sakhalin Island indicates that this area is critical to the survival of the population.
During 1999, 2000, and 2001 significant numbers of unusually thin gray whales were observed on these feeding grounds.
The cause or causes of their poor condition are undetermined.
In addition, during 19992000 the distribution of feeding activity was shifted northward compared with the distribution in 1997 and 1998.
Although the factors responsible for the changes in whale distribution and individual physical condition are currently unknown, the influence of offshore oil and gas activities cannot be ruled out, and movements of the whales away from their expected feeding areas coincided with seismic testing near those areas.
In 2001 feeding activity was again shifted northward during June and July, but when seismic surveys were being conducted between 1 August and 8 September in the northern portion of the main feeding area, whales shifted to a more southern distribution.
Once these seismic operations ceased, whales again reoccupied the more northern reaches of their feeding area.
Finally, the research on this population has included the collection of biopsy samples from 79 individuals.
The DNA comparisons indicate that eastern and western gray whales can be genetically differentiated and are considered to be geographically isolated population units.
However, because population differentiation is based on statistical differences in haplotypic frequencies and associated haplo- typic diversity indices, the origin of single individuals cannot be determined with certainty.
Recent molecular analyses of whale meat samples purchased from a Japanese market in August and October 1999 showed that they were from a gray whale.
Mitochondrial DNA sequences obtained from those samples were identical (the same haplotype) to those of a gray whale killed off western Hokkaido in May 1996 and were also identical to the most common haplotype found in both western and eastern gray whale populations.
Based on the geographic location where the whale was found, the historical occurrence of gray whales in the Sea of Japan, and the freshness of the specimen, it was concluded that this whale likely came from the western population.
Without additional analyses, however, it is uncertain if the gray whale market samples are from the Hokkaido whale or another individual.
International Whaling Commission Concerns about the western gray whale were raised at the 2001 annual meetings of the International Whaling Commission and its Scientific Committee.
The Scientific Committee noted many of the issues raised above including, among others, the "skinny" whale phenomenon, the impact of seismic surveying and other oil and gas exploration in the Sakhalin Island area, the continued low reproductive success, and the small number of reproductive females remaining in the stock.
The Committee strongly recommended that current international research and monitoring be expanded, more effective monitoring and protection measures be established, and cooperation among scientists, industry, and government officials be increased.
More specifically, they recommended that no seismic work be permitted near the feeding grounds of the Sakhalin area while western gray whales are present.
At its 2001 annual meeting, the International Whaling Commission passed a resolution noting its many concerns and asking the involved states and others to pursue all practicable actions to eliminate anthropogenic mortality and to minimize anthropogenic disturbances of the stock.
In addition, it urged that expanded research, monitoring, and management activities be strongly supported.
38 Chapter III Species of Special Concern Killer Whales in the Eastern North Pacific (Orcinus orca) Killer whales occur in all oceans of the world but are more abundant in temperate and colder waters within 800 km (500 mi) of coasts.
In the eastern North Pacific Ocean they are most common from Puget Sound, Washington, north to the Bering and Chukchi Seas.
Killer whales are large, robust animals with adult females reaching about 7 m (23 ft) in length and males reach more than 8 m (26 ft) in length.
They have a polygamous breeding system, and the reproductive cycle or season varies geographically.
Females reach sexual maturity at about 4.6 to 5.4 m (15 to 17.5 m) in length, and males at about 5.2 to 6.2 m (17 to 20 m).
Mature females give birth every three to eight years; lactation lasts about one year, but offspring may remain dependent for a second year.
Killer whales may live for 25 to 60 years.
They have distinctive pigmentation patterns and dorsal fins, making identification of individual animals relatively easy.
Killer whales, or killer whale pods, in the North Pacific are divided into three non-associating forms or ecotypes referred to as "resident," "transient," and "offshore."
Resident and transient forms show distinctive differences in genetic composition, morphology, diet, ecology, distribution, movement patterns, pod size, and social integrity of pods.
The offshore form is less well described, but appears to be more closely related to the resident form than to the transient form.
One of the more notable differences among these forms is their diet.
All killer whales are considered top-level predators, but the diet of resident killer whales appears to be composed of fish, whereas the transient form appears to prey primarily, if not completely, on marine mammals.
The diet of the offshore form has not been characterized but is assumed to be fish.
Killer whales are highly social animals that generally occur in pods of fewer than 10 or 20 animals, although larger pods or aggregations have been observed, particularly for the offshore ecotype.
In the North Pacific, the composition of pods appears to remain relatively consistent over time with about 20 percent adult males, 40 to 55 percent adult females, and the remainder immature animals of both sexes.
Interactions among individuals reflect a social 39 hierarchy, and much of their behavior (e.g., hunting, caregiving) appears to be cooperative.
They produce a number of different sounds for such purposes as communication, orientation, and foraging.
Historically, killer whales were hunted commercially, but not in large numbers.
Since the early 1960s they have been captured for public display in marine aquariums and zoos.
From 1962 until 1976 killer whales were taken for this purpose from the waters off the Pacific coast of North America, including Puget Sound.
Since 1976 most animals taken for public display have been from waters off the coasts of Japan and Iceland.
Stock Structure, Status, and Trends The National Marine Fisheries Service currently recognizes five stocks of killer whales along the western coast of North America: (1) the eastern North Pacific northern resident stock (British Columbia through Alaska), (2) the eastern North Pacific southern resident stock (inland waters of Washington State and southern British Columbia), (3) the eastern North Pacific transient stock (Alaska to Cape Flattery, Washington), (4) the California/Oregon/Washington Pacific Coast stock (Cape Flattery, Washington, through California), and (5) the eastern North Pacific offshore stock (southeastern Alaska through California).
The Service's minimum population estimate for the northern resident stock is 723 animals, which is considered conservative, and the trend in abundance cannot be described for this stock based on the available data.
The minimum estimate of abundance for the southern resident stock is 82 animals, which is a decrease of 15 animals since 1995.
Their minimum abundance estimate for the transient stock is 346 whales, which is considered conservative, and trends cannot be described for this stock based on the available data.
Abundance and trends have not been described for the California/ Oregon/Washington coastal stock.
Finally, the Service's estimate of minimum abundance for the offshore stock is 211, but this estimate is tentative, and trends for this stock cannot be determined based on the available data.
None of these stocks is listed as threatened or endangered under the Endangered Species Act or depleted under the Marine Mammal Protection Act.
However, in early May 2001 the Center for Biological Diversity petitioned the Service to list the MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2001 southern resident stock as endangered.
The petition and response are described below in the section on the southern resident stock.
The status of killer whale stocks in the eastern North Pacific has become an issue of considerable concern in the past few years due to their potential role as predators in Alaskan ecosystems and their interactions with, and vulnerability to, human activities.
Killer Whale Predation The effects of killer whale predation on two other marine mammal species in Alaska, the Steller sea lion and northern sea otter, have become a matter of considerable concern in recent years.
Killer whale predation is the leading hypothesis for the decline of the northern sea otter in the southwestern part of its range (the Alaska Peninsula west through the Aleutian Islands and including th e Ko d iak Archipelago, the Pribilof Islands, and the Bristol Bay area).
The hypothesis is that killer whales have increased their predation of sea otters to compensate for declining availability of other, more common, prey, including Steller sea lions.
Killer whale predation is also considered a possible contributing factor in the decline of Steller sea lions, at least in recent years.
The supporting evidence for these hypotheses is stronger with respect to the sea otter; both hypotheses are plausible but additional research is necessary to verify or refute them.
Unfortunately, the information needed to evaluate these hypotheses is not available in sufficient detail.
Data are needed on the rate of killer whale predation on sea lions and sea otters, either from direct observations or inferred from better information on killer whale numbers, trends, and diet.
Research programs to address these questions are being initiated by the National Marine Fisheries Service (with respect to Steller sea lions) and the Fish and Wildlife Service (with respect to northern sea otters). sets in the southeastern Bering Sea, and that an estimated 25 percent of the total catch was lost in Prince William Sound.
A review of killer whale/ longline interactions in the 1980s suggested that this phenomenon was spreading to the Aleutian Islands.
Longline fisheries exist throughout the Aleutian Islands and along the continental shelf break (200-m isobath) in the Bering Sea.
Such interactions may spread as killer whales learn to take advantage of the foraging opportunities presented by longlines with hooked fish.
In turn, the whales may be injured by ingestion of hooked fish, entangled in the longline gear, or shot by fishermen.
The Service estimates that for the period from 1995 to 1999 the average number of killer whale mortalities resulting annually from such interactions in the Bering Sea/Aleutian Islands region was about 0.8 whales.
Estimated killer whale mortality due to groundfish fisheries during the same period was similar, suggesting an average total mortality rate of about 1.4 whales per year in the Bering Sea and Aleutian Island region.
However, surveys conducted in 1992 by the Service also indicated that 8 of 182 killer whales observed in the Bering Sea and Gulf of Alaska exhibited evidence of gunshot wounds.
The mortality rate from such wounds is unknown.
In Prince William Sound 22 of 37 whales in the pod responsible for most fishery interactions were lost between 1986 and 1991.
The cause is unknown, but gunshot wounds is one of the leading hypotheses, along with possible effects of the Exxon Valdez oil spill.
A variety of techniques has been tried to reduce or eliminate such interactions, including acoustic deterrents (e.g., "bang pipes" and seal bombs) and modified fishing procedures, such as operating vessels in teams that alternately retrieve lines so that one crew can keep animals away while the other retrieves hooked fish.
To date, none of these techniques has proven to be particularly successful.
Interaction with Fisheries In the southeastern Bering Sea and Prince William Sound, killer whales interact with longline fisheries for Pacific halibut, sablefish, and Greenland turbot.
The whales sometimes damage or remove fish and damage gear.
Studies of such depredation in the 1980s indicated that the killer whales tended to target the larger fish caught, that depredation occurred on at least 20 percent of bottom longline 40 Effects of the Exxon Valdez Oil Spill The 24 March 1989 grounding of the tanker Exxon Valdez on Bligh Reef in Alaska's Prince William Sound caused the largest oil spill in U.S. history.
Although long-term effects of the spill on marine mammal populations are still being assessed, one resident killer whale pod known to inhabit Prince William Sound and one transient pod have suffered Chapter III Species of Special Concern substantially higher than normal levels of mortality and reduced reproduction since that time.
In the 15 months following the spill the resident pod, which numbered 36 whales before the spill, lost 13 individuals and failed to produce any new calves.
The pod consisted of 22 individuals in 1999, a decade after the spill, and 25 individuals in 2001.
The transient pod declined from 22 individuals in 1989 to 9 individuals in 2001.
The causes of the declines are not clear.
The resident pod was seen in and near areas where oil was present immediately after the spill.
The pod then left the sound shortly after the spill, possibly to avoid noise and other disturbances associated with clean-up activities.
The timing of the spill and related activities, and the observed declines of these pods, suggest that the spill is at least one of the leading hypotheses to explain the declines.
An alternative or perhaps complementary hypothesis, at least for the transient pod, is that the decline was related, at least in part, to a decline in the abundance of one of their main prey, harbor seals.
From 1984 to 1997 harbor seal abundance in Prince William Sound declined by 63 percent.
Southern Resident Whales Killer whales in the eastern North Pacific include a so-called southern resident stock that comprises three separate pods and ranges from waters off the northern end of Vancouver Island to Monterey Bay, California.
The pods are most commonly found, however, in the inland waters of Puget Sound, and Juan de Fuca and Georgia Straits.
In the late 1960s and early 1970s, an estimated 47 killer whales were taken from this stock for display in aquariums and for research.
Most of these animals were immature, and their removal reduced the stock to an estimated 70 animals in 1976.
Over the next two decades the population appeared to recover, at least partially, from the loss of these animals, and by 1999 abundance of the stock was estimated to be 99 animals.
Since 1995, the stock has declined again to the current abundance of 82 animals.
The decline observed over the past six years appears to have resulted from both a decrease in fecundity and an increase in mortality.
The increased mortality is particularly worrisome because it has involved not only immature animals, but also mature females.
Mature females usually have a high 41 probability of survival and are critical to the stock's ability to recover.
Three potential causes have been identified as possible contributing factors in the decline: high contaminant loads, disturbance by whale-watching ventures and other vessel activity, and declines in available prey, particularly salmon, in the central part of the stock's range.
The inland waters of Puget Sound have becom e highly polluted with organochlorines, including polychlorinated biphenyls or PCBs, that are bioaccumulated in the food chain.
Killer whales are top-level predators in the food chain, and those found in this region are considered among the most contaminated marine mammals in the world.
Their contaminant levels are similar to or greater than those observed in marine mammals in other highly polluted waters, including the Gulf of St. Lawrence and the Mediterranean Sea.
High PCB levels may compromise immune system function, and the levels observed in killer whales in this region exceed thresholds thought to cause immune system dysfunction in seals.
High contaminant loads also may compromise reproduction.
Although direct causal relations between contaminants and changes in immune and reproductive system function are difficult to prove in wild animals, existing evidence suggests the possibility of such links in Atlantic and Mediterranean cetaceans that have experienced viral epidemics.
The killer whales in the southern resident stock also may be significantly affected by whale-watching and other human activities that adversely modify the essential features of killer whale habitat or directly disturb the animals and disrupt their behavior.
Excessive contact with whale-watchers, for example, may disrupt foraging, resting, or other behaviors and cause killer whales to abandon primary habitat or shift their habitat-use patterns.
Noise associated with whale-watching or other vessels may not only disturb the animals, but also may increase ambient noise levels to the extent that it interferes with or masks killer whale sounds used for foraging, communication, or other purposes.
Finally, decline in the southern resident stock of killer whales may be due, at least in part, to a decline in the availability of their prey.
These whales depend heavily on salmon, and the abundance of salmon has declined in the Puget Sound region since the mid- to late 1980s.
Various alternatives have been suggested MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2001 to explain the decline in salmon, including regime shifts in the North Pacific, but it also is clear that large amounts of salmon habitat have been destroyed or adversely modified by humans.
In response to this decline, the Center for Biological Diversity (CBD) petitioned the National Marine Fisheries Service on 1 May 2001 to list the southern resident stock as endangered under the Endangered Species Act.
The Service determined that the petition had merit, published in the Federal Register a notice of a status review and a request for information from the public, and convened a biological review team.
One of the key issues that the team will address is whether the southern resident stock constitutes a distinct population segment.
A "distinct population segment" has been defined by the Service on the basis of three elements: "(1) discreteness of the population segment in relation to the remainder of the species to which it belongs, (2) the significance of the population segment to the species to which it belongs, and (3) the population segment's conservation status in relation to the [Endangered Species]
The Alaska Regional Scientific Review Group wrote to the Service (15 December 2001) urging the Service to use molecular genetics data collected by the Service's own researchers to redefine stocks of killer whales in the eastern North Pacific.
The review group stated that it believes th ese stocks to be unequivocally reproductively isolated.
In an earlier letter of 13 December 2000 the review group had recommended that killer whale stocks be divided into eight new stock categories and that stock assessment reports be prepared for each of them.
The Biological Review Team is expected to release a draft status review in March 2002.
The question of whether the southern resident population constitutes a distinct population segment is expected to be addressed in the review.
Current and Future Research The role of killer whales in the declines of northern sea otters and Steller sea lions and the vulnerability of killer whales to human activities are largely unresolved at this point due, in part, to the lack of support for research on killer whales.
In spite of their charisma and their ecological importance as top-level predators, elatively little research has been done on North Pacific killer whales, as is evidenced by the lack of information on stock abundances and trends.
Nonetheless, important research has been conducted on the species in spite of the small amount of support that has been available, and the resources directed to future research are expected to increase largely due to interest in the potential role of killer whales in the Steller sea lion decline.
Research efforts were increased in 2001 and increased funding is expected to be available at least through 2004.
The research is expected to focus on abundance estimation, distribution, and predation by stock and ecotype.
In view of the potential role of killer whale predation on sea lions and sea otters, the majority of this research will occur in Alaska.
Research also will be conducted on population assessments for killer whales in Prince William Sound.
Preliminary research results to date suggest that transients make up a larger portion of the total population in southeastern Alaska than in Prince William Sound or in the central Aleutian Islands region; harbor seals and porpoises are the primary prey of transient killer whales in southeastern Alaska, although Steller sea lions are also taken; the majority of the killer whales in the Aleutian Islands near Unalaska are residents (fish-eaters) rather than transients (mammal-eaters); and prey in the Unalaska region include fur seals and harbor seals (transients) and halibut (residents).
A long-term commitment to such research will be required to provide the information necessary to understand the role of killer whales in these ecosystems, their population status and trends, and their vulnerability to human activities.
Presentations by Service representatives at the Marine Mammal Commission's 2001 annual meeting described the research currently under way and anticipated for the near future.
Based on those presentations, it appears that the Service has initiated a multifaceted, multiagency research effort to address important management issues related to killer whales.
In a 31 December 2001 letter the Commission recommended that the Service pursue such research partnerships and expand its research program on killer whales to provide the necessary information that will become available only with appropriate long-term planning, funding, and coordination of effort among and within agencies.
42 Chapter III Species of Special Concern Gulf of Maine Harbor Porpoise (Phocoena phocoena) Harbor porpoises, among the smallest of all cetaceans, occur in relatively discrete regional populations throughout the temperate coastal waters of the Northern Hemisphere.
They feed on small schooling fish, such as herring and hake.
In some areas, large numbers of harbor porpoises are caught incidentally in commercial gillnet fisheries.
In the 1980s high levels of porpoise bycatch in the Bay of Fundy, Canada, and waters off New England raised grave concern over the possible effect on the Gulf of Maine/Bay of Fundy harbor porpoise population.
This population (hereafter called the Gulf of Maine population or stock) is confined to the southern Bay of Fundy and northern Gulf of Maine during summer, but occurs from Maine to New Jersey in spring and fall months and reaches as far south as North Carolina in winter.
In the late 1980s abundance estimates for this population were not available, but information su g g ested that several thousand porpoises were being killed annually in U.S. and Canadian gillnet fisheries and that this level of take was not sustainable.
Since that time, the National Marine Fisheries Service has conducted harbor porpoise population surveys in 1991, 1992, 1995, and 1999.
Although the first survey yielded a population estimate of 37,500 porpoises (95% confidence interval, 26,700 86,400), the most recent survey resulted in an estimate of 89,700 porpoises (95% confidence inter-val, 53,400� 150,900).
Most of the difference between the first and the most recent estimates is likely due to improved spatial coverage; however, an actual increase in abundance by some uncertain amount also seems possible, if not likely, given information on declining bycatch levels over the past decade.
From the 1960s, when regional gillnet fishing began, to the mid-1980s, almost all of the region's porpoise bycatch was in U.S. and Canadian gillnet fisheries for groundfish (cod, haddock, and flounder).
As gillnetters began targeting dogfish, monkfish, and other species, however, harbor porpoises were caught in those fisheries as well.
To estimate bycatch levels, the National Marine Fisheries Service began placing observers aboard a sample of U.S. gillnet vessels fishing for groundfish off New England in the late 1980s.
By comparing the number of porpoises and 43 the amount of fish caught on observed trips to total landings for the fishery, bycatch estimates were generated for the entire New England groundfish fishery.
In 1993, the Canada Department of Fisheries and Oceans began a similar program for gillnet fishing in the Bay of Fundy.
In the early 1990s the U.S. observer program was expanded to cover the dogfish and monkfish fisheries off New England, and in the mid-1990s it began monitoring gillnet fisheries for dogfish, monkfish, and coastal finfish (e.g., shad, weakfish, bluefish, and rockfish) south of New England.
Bycatch estimates from these observer programs through 2000 (the latest year for which complete data are available) are shown in Table 2.
To various degrees, these estimates are incomplete because not all fisheries that catch harbor porpoises in a given year have been monitored.
For example, in the early 1990s no estimates were available for fisheries in Canada where harbor porpoises are known to have been taken.
Even in recent years, some coastal gillnet fisheries apparently catching harbor porpoises in the mid-Atlantic (based on stranded animals with net marks in unsampled areas) have not been observed.
However, the estimates are believed to reflect a large majority of the bycatch, particularly in recent years, and they show a substantial decline in bycatch levels over the past decade.
Although bycatch estimates for 2001 were not complete as of the end of the year, preliminary estimates through the summer suggest that estimates for 2001 will be the lowest to date.
The reasons for the decrease in bycatch appear to be twofold.
First, the National Marine Fisheries Service adopted time-area fishing restrictions for the explicit purpose of reducing harbor porpoise bycatch.
These restrictions, which were incorporated into a harbor porpoise take reduction plan, include seasonal fishing closures, areas in which gillnets must meet certain specifications (e.g., twine diameter and net lengths) that have relatively low bycatch risk, and geographic areas in which gillnets must be equipped with acoustic deterrents called "pingers" (i.e., devices affixed to nets that emit periodic sound pulses at specified frequencies to try to keep porpoises away from nets).
Second, bycatch levels have been reduced because of increasingly stringent fishery management measures, such as time-area fishing closures, adopted by the Service to rebuild overfished MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2001 44 Chapter III Species of Special Concern Table 2.
Estimates of harbor porpoise bycatch in sink gillnet fisheries in the Bay of Fundy (Canada), New England (United States), and off the U.S. mid-Atlantic states, 199020001 New England 2,900 2,000 1,200 1,400 2,100 1,400 1,200 782 332 270 570 2 Year 1990 1991 1992 1993 1994 1995 1996 1997 1998 1999 2000 1 2 Bay of Fundy 3 U.S. Mid-Atlantic4 103 311 572 446 53 21 (11254) (162567) (2961,071) (294894) (398) (153) Other5 19 2 Total 1,590 1,530 1,397 788 362 612 (1,500� 5,000) (1,0003,800) (8001,700) (1,0002,000) (1,4002,900) (9002,500) (8001,800) (5011,208) (170728) (7864) (169924) 424 (200648) 101 (80122) 87 20 43 10 
Palka, D. 1997.
Gulf of Maine Harbor Porpoise By-catch.
Prepared for the Gulf of Maine Harbor Porpoise Take Reduction Team Meeting, December 1617, 1997.
National Marine Fisheries Service, Woods Hole, Massachusetts.
Estimates for 1997, 1998, and 1999 are from unpublished National Marine Fisheries Service data.
3 Trippel, E. A. 1998.
Harbour Porpoise By-Catch in the Lower Bay of Fundy Gillnet Fishery.
DFO Maritime Regional Fisheries Status Report 98/7E.
Canadian Department of Fisheries and Oceans, Dartmouth, Nova Scotia.
Estimate for 1999 is from unpublished data provided by E. A. Trippel.
4 Palka, D. 1997.
Mid-Atlantic Harbor Porpoise By-catch and Gear Characteristics.
Prepared for the Gulf of Maine Harbor Porpoise Take Reduction Team Meeting, 1617 December 1997.
National Marine Fisheries Service, Woods Hole, Massachusetts.
Estimates for 1997 to 2000 are from unpublished National Marine Fisheries Service data.
5 Harbor porpoise strandings with signs of gillnet fisheryrelated interactions in areas of the U.S. mid-Atlantic region not monitored by fishery observers.
stocks of groundfish and monkfish.
Some of these closures also include areas of historically high porpoise bycatch.
In addition, because fishery management measures reduced landing quotas and placed limits on the number of days gillnetters were allowed to fish, many participants in these fisheries have dropped out, thereby reducing the number of deployed gillnets.
Although it is unclear precisely how much bycatch has been reduced by either one of these two sets of measures, it now seems likely that harbor porpoise bycatch has been reduced to a sustainable level that could allow the population to increase or remain stable.
Figure 6.
(Opposite page) Time-area management zones under the Gulf of Maine Harbor Porpoise Take Reduction Plan (figure courtesy of Caroline Good, National Marine Fisheries Service).
To provide a basis for managing the incidental take of marine mammals in commercial fisheries in U.S. waters, the Marine Mammal Protection Act was amended in 1994 to require that the National Marine Fisheries Service prepare stock assessment reports for each marine mammal stock under its jurisdiction in U.S. waters.
In part, each assessment is to calculate a potential biological removal (PBR) level.
If incidental taking exceeds that level, the Service is to convene a take reduction team to develop a plan that will reduce the bycatch to below the PBR level within six months.
PBR is calculated using a formula designed to estimate the number of animals that can be removed from a stock annually (not including natural mortality) while maintaining a high degree of assurance that it will continue to increase toward or remain at its optimum sustainable population level.
The formula relies, in part, on the 45 MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2001 lower limit of a population's estimated range of abundance (i.e., minimum population size) and its estimated maximum productivity rate.
Based on data available when the first harbor porpoise stock assessment was completed in 1995, bycatch levels were estimated to be several times higher than the stock's calculated PBR level of 403 porpoises per year.
Based on the 1999 population survey, however, PBR is now calculated to be 747 porpoises per year.
Bycatch estimates were below this level for both 1999 and 2000.
Harbor Porpoise Take Reduction Plan As noted above, the Marine Mammal Protection Act requires the National Marine Fisheries Service to convene a Harbor Porpoise Take Reduction Team and to prepare a take reduction plan whenever the incidental taking of marine mammals by commercial fisheries exceeds a marine mammal stock's calculated PBR level.
Such plans are to include regulatory and nonregulatory measures to meet the Act's goals of reducing incidental marine mammal takes to below the PBR level within six months of implementation, and subsequently for reducing takes to levels approaching zero by April 2001.
In response to this requirement and high levels of porpoise bycatch, the Service established two harbor porpoise take reduction teams.
In February 1996 it established a Gulf of Maine team to recommend measures for gillnet fisheries off New England, and in February 1997 it established a team to address incidental taking by gillnet fisheries between New York and North Carolina.
Two teams, rather than one, were established because of differences in the fisheries in the two regions.
The teams include representatives of regional fisheries, environmental groups, the scientific community, and involved federal and state agencies.
A representative of the Commission has participated on both teams.
Each team developed a different regulatory approach to reduce porpoise bycatch.
The Gulf of Maine team recommended seasonal fishing closures in high bycatch areas and management zones in which gillnets were required to be equipped with pingers at either end of each individual net panel making up a gillnet string.
Scientific experiments indicate that pingers are capable of reducing bycatch by as much as 90 percent when properly maintained and deployed.
The mid-Atlantic team also 46 recommended seasonal fishing closures but chose not to rely on pingers.
Instead it recommended requirements based on data that suggested that harbor porpoise bycatch rates would be low if certain fishing practices (e.g., soak times -- that is the length of time a net is allowed to remain in the water after being set) and gear characteristics (e.g., twine diameter for mesh, mesh size, tie-downs to limit the vertical height of nets, and the number and length of nets) were used.
As discussed in previous annual reports, the teams met numerous times and submitted their respective recommended plans to the Service.
The Service was slow to respond to recommendations and failed to meet certain statutory deadlines, which prompted the lawsuit to compel action on some measures.
However, in December 1998 the Service adopted a Gulf of Maine Harbor Porpoise Take Reduction Plan that combined recommended elements from both teams.
The plan was implemented under provisions of the Marine Mammal Protection Act.
The regulatory measures for New England included six seasonal management zones in which fishing was either prohibited entirely or permitted only if gillnets were equipped with pingers (see Fig. 6).
The measures for mid-Atlantic gillnet fisheries included seasonal fishery closures and seasonal restrictions on the fishing practices and gear characteristics mentioned above.
Nonregulatory measures addressed various research, enforcement, bycatch monitoring, and education issues.
To review progress toward reducing bycatch and to develop further recommendations for meeting established goals, the Service reconvened the two take reduction teams late in 2000.
The mid-Atlantic team met on 2830 November 2000 and the Gulf of Maine team met on 1213 December 2000.
At both meetings, Service representatives reminded the teams that the Marine Mammal Protection Act required that incidental take levels be reduced to "insignificant levels approaching a zero mortality and serious injury rate."
Although the Service has not yet defined this standard, for planning purposes the team was advised that the Service was considering a reduction in bycatch to no more than 10 percent of PBR (i.e., 76 porpoises per year) to satisfy this goal.
Recognizing that such a reduction could not be met by the statutory deadline of April 2001, the Service Chapter III Species of Special Concern proposed a new date of 2 December 2003 as the target for reaching the zero mortality rate goal.
At its meeting, the Gulf of Maine team was particularly disturbed by evidence from the observer program of noncompliance with established regulations (e.g., fishing without pingers in zones requiring such devices) and the lack of at-sea enforcement effort.
They expressed a strong view that efforts to implement seasonal enforcement must take precedence over other recommended measures and that enforcement should include the boarding of boats at sea to inspect for compliance.
The Gulf of Maine team also recommended measures to assess whether noncompliance with pinger req u irements or improperly maintained pingers were significant factors causing bycatch.
It recommended that the Service establish an annual certification program for any one wishing to fish in an area restricted to pingers.
To be certified, gillnetters would need to participate in a training session on the use of pingers and current restrictions, present their pingers for testing, and agree to have their certificate on board when fishing in an area where pingers are required.
In addition, the team recommended that fishery observers be equipped with devices to test pingers on either side of a net panel in which an incidentally caught harbor porpoise is found to determine if the pingers were working properly at the time a porpoise was caught.
For waters south of New England, the midAtlantic team recommended that waters inside Delaware Bay be excluded from gear restrictions.
A similar exclusion exists for waters in Chesapeake Bay, and the team concluded that bycatch data from Delaware Bay did not justify inclusion of the area in the plan.
The team also expressed concern about the adequacy of the observer coverage, which had declined from 5 to 2 percent and was not covering many segments of the gillnet fleet at levels sufficient to develop useful bycatch estimates.
In addition, it was noted that recent levels of observer coverage were not adequate to determine when the zero mortality rate goal was achieved.
That is, as fewer harbor porpoises are taken, observer coverage must be increased in order to estimate low bycatch levels with any useful statistical confidence.
The team therefore recommended that the Service increase observer sampling to at least 6 percent of the overall mid-Atlantic gillnet fishing fleet.
47 Both teams also strongly recommended that the Service conduct a scientific experiment to assess the effectiveness of new acoustically reflective gillnets in reducing harbor porpoise bycatch.
The new nets are made of hollow-core strands filled with a material that reflects sound so that echolocating porpoises might detect nets more easily.
Preliminary tests of the new nets in Canada appear promising; however, those tests have not been extensive and they have not followed a rigorous scientific protocol.
The teams therefore recommended conducting an experiment to compare bycatch rates in the new nets with those in nets equipped with pingers.
Finally, both teams expressed concern about relying on take reduction measures outside of the harbor porpoise take reduction plan (i.e., closures under fishery management plans) to reduce harbor porpoise bycatch.
The Gulf of Maine team recommended that the Service prepare a proposal for integrating key fishery management plan closures for groundfish into the harbor porpoise take reduction plan.
In this way, changes to those measures warranted by fishery management data would not incidentally increase porpoise bycatch.
The midAtlantic team also felt that better coordination between the planning process for take reduction plans and fishery management plans was essential, but concluded that it was premature to recommend an integrated course of action.
Instead, it recommended that the Service develop a process for calculating the effects of changes to fishery management plans on harbor porpoise bycatch and consult with the fishery management councils and harbor porpoise take reduction teams to identify proposed changes to the harbor porpoise plan that may be needed.
With regard to the latter issue, the Marine Mammal Commission wrote to the Service on 17 November 2000 following a review of the status of harbor porpoise conservation measures at its 1012 October 2000 annual meeting.
During that meeting the Commission learned that the New England Fishery Management Council was considering actions to reconfigure fishery closures under the groundfish fishery management plan that could have an effect on harbor porpoise bycatch.
In its letter, the Commission recommended that the Service estimate possible increases in harbor porpoise bycatch that might result from the proposed changes to the groundfish plan and that, concurrent with any action MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2001 to implement them, the Service adopt compensatory bycatch reduction measures under the harbor porpoise take reduction plan.
On 2 February 2001 the Service responded to the Commission's 17 November letter noting that it would consider effects of proposed changes to fishery management plans on harbor porpoises during the process of reviewing required environmental assessments or environmental impact statements.
Where proposed changes would increase harbor porpoise bycatch, it noted that it would discuss those changes with the Council and ask the harbor porpoise take reduction teams to recommend changes to the harbor porpoise take reduction plan.
It also noted that it would consider the Gulf of Maine team's recommendation on integrating all measures necessary to protect harbor porpoises under the plan.
The New England Fishery Management Council subsequently decided against altering the fishery closures most beneficial to harbor porpoises.
During 2001 there were few new developments in the harbor porpoise conservation program.
Apparently due to limited staff and funding and higher priority needs for other species, there was limited progress on implementing recommendations of the two take reduction teams.
Neither team met in 2001.
However, as recommended by the midAtlantic team at its meeting in November 2000, the Service adopted rules on 11 January 2001 exempting Delaware Bay from the gear restrictions in the harbor porpoise take reduction plan.
To determine if deployed pingers are working properly, the Service also completed development of a device to check whether pingers properly emit sound.
Although further development work will be needed to design devices that can test for a wider range of frequencies, an initial order for 10 devices capable of checking for frequencies on most pingers now in use was received late in 2001.
As of the end of 2001 the Service had not yet decided whether these devices should be provided to enforcement officers to randomly check deployed gillnets or to fishery observers to test pingers in nets that catch porpoises.
Support was not provided in 2001 for the scientific study recommended by both take reduction teams to field-test new acoustically reflective gillnets, and as of the end of the year it was not clear whether or what steps might be taken to conduct such a study.
As a related matter, however, the Service provided 48 funding for a study to determine if captive bottlenose dolphins can detect reflective netting more easily than traditional netting.
This study was undertaken as part of efforts to develop a bottlenose dolphin take reduction plan (see also the following section of this chapter).
At the end of 2001 the Service also had not yet developed a mandatory annual certification program for using pingers in New England waters.
As noted above, however, preliminary information on bycatch estimates through the summer of 2001 indicated that bycatch levels for 2001 would be even lower than the 1999 and 2000 estimates.
Endangered Species Status Review for Gulf of Maine Harbor Porpoises In September 1991 the Sierra Club Legal Defense Fund (now known as Earthjustice) petitioned the National Marine Fisheries Service to list the Gulf of Maine harbor porpoise population as threatened under the Endangered Species Act.
The petition was prompted by the large harbor porpoise bycatch at that time and the lack of any management actions to reduce that take.
As discussed in previous annual reports, the Service published a proposed rule on 7 January 1993 to list the population as threatened.
Public comments on the action were requested several times over the next five years, but each time, the Service deferred a decision because it believed that measures it was taking to reduce bycatch levels would eliminate the need to list the population or, in one case, because a moratorium had been imposed on listing actions.
Delays in acting on the petition and the failure to meet other statutory deadlines required for harbor porpoise conservation led to a lawsuit filed in 1998 against the Secretary of Commerce by the Center for Marine Conservation, the Humane Society of the United States, and the International Wildlife Coalition.
As part of an agreement to settle the suit, the Service committed to making a final decision on the listing action in early January 1999.
If the Service chose not to list the population, it also agreed to review the population's status by 31 March 2001 to determine if its decision was still warranted.
On 5 January 1999 the Service withdrew its listing proposal, but retained the harbor porpoise population on the Endangered Species Act list of candidate species for further review.
Chapter III Species of Special Concern On 2 August 2001 the National Marine Fisheries Service published a proposed rule and accompanying analysis in the Federal Register to remove the Gulf of Maine harbor porpoise population from the Endangered Species Act list of candidate species.
Among other things, the Service's analysis noted that estimated bycatch levels had declined substantially to below the population's calculated PBR level in 1999 and 2000.
It assumed that this reduction was due to a combination of actions taken under the harbor porpoise take reduction plan and those taken under fishery management plans to reduce gillnet fishing.
With regard to the latter point, the Service noted that if the goals of fishery management plans are met and fish stocks increase, closures incidentally protecting harbor porpoises could be lifted outside of the harbor porpoise take reduction plan process.
To address this possibility, the Service said it would monitor actions taken under relevant fishery management plans to ensure that any changes that may result in unanticipated increases in harbor porpoise bycatch are mitigated through available regulatory mechanisms.
It also noted that it may revise the harbor porpoise take reduction plan to include all measures necessary to ensure reduced harbor porpoise bycatch instead of relying on fishery management plan time-area closures.
On 19 October 2001 the Service published a final rule deleting the Gulf of Maine harbor porpoise from the list of candidate species.
It noted that since withdrawing its proposal to list the population as threatened in 1999, there was no new information to suggest that the incidental take by commercial fishing could cause the stock to be in danger of extinction or likely to become so in the foreseeable future.
It therefore concluded that listing as either endangered or threatened was not warranted at this time.
In response to concerns about the lack of plans to prevent the lifting of fishery management plan closures that help protect harbor porpoises, the Service stated that relying on an adaptive strategy to protect harbor porpoises under both the harbor porpoise take reduction plan and fishery management plans had reduced bycatch to below its PBR level and it considered this to be the best strategy for preventing potential increases in harbor porpoise bycatch.
It also stated that it would be aware of any changes that the New England or Mid-Atlantic Fishery Management Councils might propose to 49 fishery management measures that might affect harbor porpoises directly or indirectly, and that it would work with the councils and the two harbor porpoise take reduction teams to determine whether any changes to fishery management plans would precipitate the need for changes to the harbor porpoise take reduction plan.
Bottlenose Dolphins along the Atlantic and Gulf of Mexico Coasts (Tursiops truncatus) Bottlenose dolphins are distributed throughout the world's temperate and tropical regions, and are the most common marine mammal along the U.S. southeastern and Gulf of Mexico coasts.
Bottlenose dolphins are long-lived; males and females may exceed 40 and 50 years of age, respectively, although the majority of animals do not live to these ages.
Females reach sexual maturity at about five to ten years of age and males at about eight to twelve years of age.
Mature adults measure about 2.5 m (8.2 ft) in length, although males tend to be slightly larger.
They have a promiscuous breeding system in which males and females may have multiple mating partners.
Females generally give birth to single offspring every three to six years and provide relatively long parental care (on the order of 1820 months or more).
Bottlenose dolphins may occur as solitary individuals or in groups ranging from two to hundreds of animals.
They form strong social bonds and their social interactions are complex and dynamic, varying in apparent purpose (e.g., traveling, foraging, care of offspring), composition (e.g., different sex and age classes), and longevity.
Bottlenose dolphins eat a variety of prey, including benthic (associated with the bottom), pelagic (in the water column), and surface-dwelling fish and invertebrates.
Common prey includes weakfish, Atlantic croaker, spot, silver perch, sand seatrout, mullet, and squid.
Their primary predators are large sharks.
Stock Structure, Status, and Trends Bottlenose dolphin stock structure is relatively complex and poorly understood.
In the western North Atlantic, bottlenose dolphins can be distinguished as belonging to either of two different ecotypes -- coastal or offshore.
These ecotypes are distinguished not only on the basis of their MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2001 distribution, but also their genetic composition, morphology, parasites, and prey.
In addition, in coastal areas some dolphins occur primarily along the outer coastline; others inhabit bays, sounds, inlets, estuaries, and other more inland waters.
The above general description of bottlenose dolphins is based primarily on the coastal ecotype because relatively little is known about the offshore ecotype.
Stock structure is further complicated because dolphins within these ecotypes compose different reproductive stocks; that is, groups of animals that are more or less reproductively isolated from other groups within the same ecotype.
The degree of reproductive isolation is important not only because it serves as a basis for genetic and evolutionary separation of stocks, but also because it is an important determinant of each stock's vulnerability to, and ability to recover from, adverse influences, both natural and human-related.
Efforts to distinguish reproductive stocks are complicated by the difficulty of studying these animals in their natural environment, by the fact that animals from different stocks cannot be separated on the basis of appearance, and by the fact that different stocks have geographic ranges that overlap temporally and spatially.
In 1987 and 1988 a large number of bottlenose dolphins stranded along the eastern coast of the U n ite d Sta t e s (described below), and the geographical pattern of the die-off was taken as evidence of a single coastal migratory stock.
In 1993 the Service designated that stock as depleted under the Marine Mammal Protection Act, but the Service's stock assessment reports from 1995 to 2000 describe only a general western North Atlantic coastal stock.
In 1997, ten years after the die-off of the purported coastal migratory stock, the National Marine Fisheries Service established a research program to investigate stock structure primarily using genetics, but also using photo-identification, telemetry, stable isotope ratios, and information from strandings.
Initial efforts have focused along the Atlantic coast because this region includes the so-called coastal migratory stock and because of documented high levels of incidental take in gillnet fisheries in the areas occupied by this purported stock.
Preliminary results have provided additional insights into possible stock structure along the Atlantic coast and suggest the possibility of at least seven stocks in this region, 50 consisting of migratory animals as well as year-round and seasonal residents in the ocean and in bays, sounds, and estuaries of the mid-Atlantic and southeastern Atlantic Ocean off the East Coast of the United States.
Additional research on this matter is still needed.
The take reduction team convened by the Service in 2001 is operating under the assumption that seven coastal bottlenose dolphin stocks exist in the western North Atlantic.
Similar research is needed in the Gulf of Mexico, where stock structure is even less clear.
In March 2000 the Service hosted a meeting in Sarasota, Florida, to discuss the most efficient ways to resolve questions about the species' stock structure in the gulf.
A brief report of that meeting was provided to the Commission at its 2000 annual meeting.
Service personnel indicated that funds would be sought to begin a comprehensive research program similar to that now under way along the Atlantic coast.
In a 12 December 2000 letter to the National Marine Fisheries Service, the Commission agreed that comprehensive studies along the Atlantic coast provided a good framework for future dolphin research in the Gulf of Mexico.
The Commission commended the Service for its efforts in this regard and urged it to expedite funding for such research.
Lacking better information, the National Marine Fisheries Service currently recognizes 38 stocks in the Gulf of Mexico region (outer continental shelf, continental shelf edge and continental slope, western coastal, northern coastal, and eastern coastal, and 33 resident stocks in contiguous, enclosed, or semienclosed bodies of water adjacent to the Gulf of Mexico).
The most recent abundance estimates for these purported stocks are provided in Table 3.
The available information is insufficient for trend analysis for all currently recognized stocks of bottlenose dolphins in the Gulf of Mexico and along the southeastern North Atlantic coast.
Determination of the status of and risks to dolphin stocks will be difficult even after stocks have been identified.
Nevertheless, the lack of information on bottlenose dolphin stock structure in these regions is a major impediment to assessment of their status and trends because status and trends are most meaningfully described on the basis of reproductively discrete stocks.
Similarly, the lack of information on stock structure impedes the analysis of effects from die-offs, fisheries interactions, coastal Chapter III Species of Special Concern Table 3.
Estimates of abundance for bottlenose dolphin stocks in the western North Atlantic (WNA) and Gulf of Mexico (GOM) as reported in stock assessment reports prepared by the National Marine Fisheries Service.
Most counts from aerial or shipboard line transects.
Survey Year 1998 1994 1995 19921994 Estimate 30,633 2,482 50,247 Note The Service declined to use this estimate due to the overlap of coastal and offshore dolphins in the region counted.
The estimate does not include dolphins in "inshore" waters (bays, sounds, inlets, etc.)
Estimates were based on aerial line-transect surveys that overlapped the range of the continental shelf edge and slope stock and may therefore include a positive (unquantified) bias.
Stock WNA Offshore WNA Coastal GOM Outer Continental Shelf GOM Continental Shelf Edge and Slope GOM Western Coastal GOM Northern Coastal GOM Eastern Coastal GOM Bay, Sound and Estuarine Stocks 1992 1994 5,618 1992 1993 3,499 4,191 Trend analysis was not conducted but 1983 estimate of abundance was 4,718.
Trend analysis was not conducted but 19831985 estimate of abundance was 1,319.
Trend analysis was not conducted but 1985 estimate of abundance was 4,711.
Counts of zero were reported for eight areas where previous counts indicated at least seasonal presence of dolphins; data are insufficient to determine trends.
1994 1992 1994 9,912 Ranged from 0 to 1,401 development, oil and gas operations, and other factors or events that pose potential threats to bottlenose dolphins.
Threats to Bottlenose Dolphin Stocks Bottlenose dolphins are exposed to a variety of natural and human-related factors that may threaten the well-being of individual dolphins or the status of dolphin stocks.
Natural factors include predation by large sharks, disease (e.g., morbillivirus) and parasites, exposure due to naturally occurring biotoxins, and changes in prey availability or loss of habitat due to natural environmental variation.
51 Human-related factors include loss of habitat due to coastal development, direct exposure to toxins from human-generated pollution (e.g., agricultural runoff), disturbance, vessel strikes, entanglement in human debris, noise and pollution related to oil and gas development, direct and indirect interactions with recreational and commercial fisheries (e.g., incidental mortality in nets and loss of prey from fisheries competing for the same prey), and injury or mortality that may result from direct human interactions such as the feeding of wild dolphins.
These factors may act independently or synergistically.
For example, exposure to pollutants may reduce immune system MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2001 function thereby lowering resistance to disease; human-related contamination of coastal waters may increase the likelihood of phytoplankton blooms that result in increased concentrations of biotoxins; or direct interactions such as the feeding of dolphins may increase the likelihood of dolphin injury or mortality due to vessel strikes.
Compared with offshore bottlenose dolphins, coastal dolphins may be at greater risk to human-related threats due to their greater proximity to human activities.
Die-Offs The effects of various threats to bottlenose dolphins in the southeastern United States have manifested themselves most obviously in a series of at least six die-offs observed over the past 15 years.
Animals stranded on beaches provide the most obvious evidence of a die-off, but it is not clear that those animals provide a complete and reliable basis for characterizing each die-off (e.g., some dead stranded animals may not be found and some dead animals may not strand or wash ashore).
Furthermore, the effect of a die-off on a particular stock of dolphins can only be determined if that stock has been identified and sufficient information exists to put the die-off in perspective.
Such information includes stock abundance, status and trends, and composition.
Because the stock structure of bottlenose dolphins along the southeastern coast and in the Gulf of Mexico is poorly understood, as is the abundance, status, and trends of each stock, it is difficult to determine the significance of the observed die-offs.
In 1987 and 1988 the annual number of stranded dolphins on the East Coast increased tenfold relative to previously observed stranding levels.
The available evidence suggested morbillivirus or biotoxicants as possible causes, and both may have contributed, either independently or synergistically.
The die-off started in the mid-Atlantic region, moved northward and then southward to encompass essentially the entire coastline from New Jersey to central Florida.
The pattern of stranded animals was considered evidence for a single coastal migratory stock along the eastern coast, and an analysis of the event suggested that more than half of this coastal stock may have died.
On that basis, the purported coastal migratory stock was designated as depleted in 1993.
The most recent die-off of bottlenose dolphins in the southeastern United States occurred from May to August 2001 in the vicinity of the Indian River Lagoon along the eastern coast of Florida.
At least 52 35 animals are known to have died; the cause of their deaths are under investigation (see Chapter VI on marine mammal unusual mortality events).
Contaminants Bottlenose dolphins, particularly those occurring in coastal or inland waters, are exposed to contaminants from a variety of sources including agricultural runoff, vessel pollution, pollution from oil and gas exploration and drilling, and sewage and other waste from coastal developments.
Although a considerable number of studies have been conducted illustrating the presence and increasing concentration of contaminants in marine mammal tissues (including those of bottlenose dolphins), the effects of those contaminants on the health of both individuals and marine mammal populations has been difficult to assess.
Potential effects of contaminants are thought to include direct health risks to individual animals (e.g., impairment of immune function) as well as impairment of their ability to reproduce.
Contaminant loads for some chemicals may increase over time due to bio-accumulation, and some contaminants also may be passed directly from mother to fetus.
In a letter of 18 December 1998 to the Service, the Commission recommended that the Service consult with the Environmental Protection Agency, the Minerals Management Service, and relevant coastal state agencies to determine whether everything necessary was being done to assess the sources, levels, and effects of anthropogenic contaminants present in bottlenose dolphins in waters off the U.S. Atlantic and Gulf states.
In a 12 December 2000 letter to the Service, the Commission recommended that the Service initiate carefully controlled experiments and testing to clarify the effects of anthropogenic toxins on individual dolphins and on dolphin populations.
The Commission noted that both the report of the Commission's October 1998 workshop on marine mammals and persistent ocean cotaminants and a 1998 report from the International Whaling Commission's Scientific Committee have recommended a multifaceted research approach (combining behavioral observations, life history research, ecological assessment, health monitoring, and toxicology) using index populations of marine mammals, including bottlenose dolphins.
At the end of 2000 the Service had indicated that funding would be made available in 2001 for studies of the effects of toxins Chapter III Species of Special Concern on the Sarasota Bay dolphin population, and in 2001 a total of $25,000 was dedicated to those studies.
Tourism and direct human interactions In recent years, commercial ventures that encourage close and sometimes illegal interactions between humans and dolphins have proliferated in the southeastern United States (also discussed in Chapter IX).
These ventures offer members of the public a variety of experiences from watching to swimming with wild dolphins.
In some cases, such activities have been interpreted to constitute harassment, whereas in others the legal status is less clear.
The feeding of free-ranging dolphins, an activity explicitly prohibited under established regulations, also has persisted in various locations.
To document the extent, nature, and effects of such activities, the Commission contracted for a study to (1) review the literature on the topic of human-dolphin interactions, and (2) quantify and describe the development of swim-with-the-dolphin programs in the Florida panhandle.
The study was completed in April 2000 and is available from the Commission (see Appendix B).
The study divided free-ranging dolphins into four behavioral types: (1) solitary but sociable with humans, (2) foodprovisioned, (3) habituated to humans, and (4) not habituated to humans.
Although the report acknowledged a lack of information about the effects of human-dolphin interactions, it concluded that (1) dolphins are vulnerable to injury and death as a result of human contact; (2) animals appearing tolerant of or even seeking such contact have already been placed at risk by extensive habituation achieved through considerable human effort; (3) such contact can disrupt important natural behaviors of wild dolphins; and (4) a precautionary approach is necessary to ensure the protection of wild dolphins from the adverse effects of human-dolphin interactions.
At the Commission's 2000 annual meeting, representatives of the Service reviewed the status of such activities in the southeastern United States and expressed grave concern about the individual and cumulative effects of close interactions between humans and dolphins.
They advised the Commission that new draft regulations to address these interactions would soon be circulated to the Commission and other agencies for comment.
In its 12 December 2000 letter to the Service, the Commission commended such efforts and urged haste in adopting 53 clear, rational regulations and guidelines.
The Commission also urged the Service to consult with other involved agencies (e.g., the Fish and Wildlife Service and the public display industry) to assure that a consistent message reach the public.
The Commission noted that patrons of public display facilities offering swim-with-the-dolphin or dolphin-feeding exhibits may be confused about what constitutes appropriate behavior with marine mammals in the wild, and that regulations developed by the Service should be consistent with those issued by the Fish and Wildlife Service for species under its charge.
In July 2001 the National Marine Fisheries Service consulted with the Commission regarding a draft policy developed to address the issue of interactions between the public and marine mammals in the wild.
The policy was intended to clarify those interactions constituting harassment.
In a 16 July 2001 letter responding to the Service, the Commission expressed its understanding that the Service still intends to promulgate regulations clarifying those interactions between the public and wild marine mammals that constitute harassment.
The Commission agreed that, before implementation of such regulations, the policy would help provide the public needed guidance regarding such activities.
Enforcement is an important element of management efforts to avoid harassment of bottlenose dolphins (and other marine mammals) by direct human interaction.
At the Commission's 2000 annual meeting, representatives of the Service discussed problems relating to inadequate and ineffective enforcement of regulations intended to protect bottlenose dolphins and other marine life.
They noted that enforcement has been compromised by an inadequate number of enforcement officers, the extensive coastline to be covered, and the large number of competing, high-priority demands requiring attention (e.g., investigation of interactions between shrimp fisheries and turtles).
In its 12 December 2000 letter to the Service, the Commission strongly recommended that enforcement staffing and efforts be increased significantly, not only for bottlenose dolphins, but also for other species for which the Service is responsible.
The letter noted that the Commission also had urged the Fish and Wildlife Service and the Florida Division of Law Enforcement to increase their enforcement capabilities.
Finally, the letter recommended that the Service should seek MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2001 to develop a coordinated enforcement strategy involving all three agencies in Florida.
Fisheries Interactions and Take Reduction Efforts Bottlenose dolphins interact with recreational and commercial fisheries throughout their range along the southeastern North Atlantic and Gulf of Mexico coasts.
They may be killed or seriously injured incidental to a variety of fishing operations and gear types including gillnets, crab pots, haul/ beach seines, long-haul seines, pound nets, and stop nets.
They also may be injured or killed by consuming fish caught by hook-and-line fisheries or killed in fishery-generated debris such as lost netting and lines.
Evidence and estimates of fishery interactions suggest that fishery-related mortality may be impeding the recovery of the putative coastal migratory stock of dolphins that was designated as depleted following the 19871988 die-off.
Based on that concern, the National Marine Fisheries Service convened a take reduction team on 68 November 2001 to begin the process of developing a plan for reducing the number of fishery-related takes of bottlenose dolphins along the eastern North Atlantic coast from New Jersey southward.
The team consists of representatives of the different fisheries involved, the Atlantic States Marine Fisheries Commission, the Mid-Atlantic Fishery Management Council, the South Atlantic Fishery Management Council, the National Marine Fisheries Service, fishery management agencies of the affected states, universities in the regions affected, conservation organizations, animal welfare organizations, and the Marine Mammal Commission.
Although the official take reduction team met on only one occasion in 2001, the Service hosted two workshops (1516 May and 1112 July 2001) prior to the initial team meeting to review and discuss basic information necessary to describe the problem to be addressed by the team.
The primary focus of those workshops and the initial team meeting was on stock structure of bottlenose dolphins in coastal waters from New Jersey to Florida, abundance estimates of purported stocks, estimates of the potential biological removal level of each stock, the fisheries that occur within the range of the stocks under consideration, estimates of the number of 54 dolphins killed by fisheries and other sources of human-related mortality, potential measures to reduce fishing-related mortality, and research needed to facilitate the take reduction process.
The team's task will be confounded by the considerable uncertainty regarding stock structure, abundance estimates for each stock, annual fisheries-related mortality, and methods for assessing such mortality.
The take reduction team is expected to continue its deliberations until rulemaking can be initiated, which is anticipated for mid-2002.
Conservation Plan As described in previous annual reports, the Commission has repeatedly recommended that the National Marine Fisheries Service develop and implement a bottlenose dolphin conservation plan for the putative western North Atlantic coastal migratory stock.
As noted above, this stock was declared depleted in 1993, based on estimates that it may have declined by over 50 percent as a result of the 1987 1988 die-off.
On 25 May 2001, almost 15 years after the die-off and 8 years after the depleted designation, a draft plan was forwarded to the Commission for review and comment.
The plan provides an overview of the species' history, a review of its natural history characteristics, a summary of known and possible human-related and natural factors that may threaten the population or impede its recovery, an outline of needed and prioritized research and conservation actions, a schedule for implementing those actions, and their projected costs.
Necessary actions included (1) identification of stock structure of coastal bottlenose dolphins, (2) estimation of abundance for each stock, (3) assessment of human-related sources of mortality for each stock, (4) assessment of the overall status of each stock, (5) retrospective analysis of the 19871988 die-off, (6) establishment of a biomonitoring program to assess the incidence of disease, (7) examination and characterization of factors that could change carrying capacity for bottlenose dolphin stocks, and (8) establishment of a coordinator position to ensure implementation of the plan.
The draft plan also suggested that, in the absence of information to determine the stock's optimum sustainable population level (i.e., that level above which the population would no longer be considered depleted), the time to recovery could be estimated using model simulations if human-related Chapter III Species of Special Concern mortality of dolphins remains under the potential biological removal level as described in the Marine Mammal Protection Act.
In a letter of 15 June 2001 the Marine Mammal Commission commended the Service and its contractors on the overall quality of the conservation plan and provided comments.
The Commission's two main questions were whether the Service has adequate funding to implement the plan, and whether the Service would be preparing a similar plan for bottlenose dolphins in the Gulf of Mexico, where dolphin populations are threatened by many of the same problems observed along the southeastern North Atlantic coast.
The Commission also encouraged the Service to release the plan to the public for further comment.
As of 31 December 2001 the Service was updating the plan with the new information on bottlenose dolphin stock structure and abundance and take reduction efforts.
It anticipated release of the plan in draft form for public comment in 2002.
55 Chapter III Species of Special Concern mortality of dolphins remains under the potential biological removal level as described in the Marine Mammal Protection Act.
In a letter of 15 June 2001 the Marine Mammal Commission commended the Service and its contractors on the overall quality of the conservation plan and provided comments.
The Commission's two main questions were whether the Service has adequate funding to implement the plan, and whether the Service would be preparing a similar plan for bottlenose dolphins in the Gulf of Mexico, where dolphin populations are threatened by many of the same problems observed along the southeastern North Atlantic coast.
The Commission also encouraged the Service to release the plan to the public for further comment.
As of 31 December 2001 the Service was updating the plan with the new information on bottlenose dolphin stock structure and abundance and take reduction efforts.
It anticipated release of the plan in draft form for public comment in 2002.
Cook Inlet Beluga Whale (Delphinapterus leucas) Beluga whales are found in seasonally ice-covered waters throughout arctic and subarctic regions.
With the exception of those in the northern Gulf of Alaska, most beluga whales in U.S. waters are thought to winter in the Bering Sea in open leads and polynyas in the pack ice.
In spring and summer, they are found in coastal areas or the offshore pack ice.
For management purposes, five stocks are recognized in U.S. waters.
The distinction is based on the stocks' discontinuous summer distribution and on mitochondrial DNA analyses that indicate clear genetic differences among animals using different summering areas.
The five stocks are named after their primary summering areas, which are located in Cook Inlet, Bristol Bay, the eastern Bering Sea, the eastern Chukchi Sea, and the Beaufort Sea.
The most isolated population of beluga whales in U.S. waters is found in Cook Inlet and is separated from the other four summer populations by the Alaska Peninsula.
Because of their proximity to Anchorage, beluga whales in Cook Inlet are exposed to the largest urban coastal area in Alaska.
Analyses by the National Marine Fisheries Service of beluga whale sightings in 55 Cook Inlet over the past 30 years indicate that the stock's summer range has contracted substantially in recent years.
Compared with sightings in the 1970s and 1980s, animals are rarely seen now in offshore waters or the lower reaches of the inlet.
In June, when the National Marine Fisheries Service conducts aerial surveys of the population, beluga whales are concentrated in a few groups in the upper reaches of the inlet around the Susitna River delta, Knik Arm, and Turnagain Arm.
Aerial surveys of beluga whales in Cook Inlet have been conducted by the National Marine Fisheries Service annually in June or July since 1994.
Data from those surveys indicate that the Cook Inlet beluga whale population declined from an estimated 653 (CV = 0.43) individuals in 1994 to 347 (CV = 0.29) in 1998.
This constitutes about a 47 percent decline in four years.
The 1999 surveys yielded an abundance estimate of 367 (CV = 0.14), somewhat higher but not significantly different than the 1998 estimate.
The 2000 surveys produced the lowest index count (184 whales) since systematic surveys began.
However, when corrected to account for missed whales and missed groups of whales, the 2000 estimate was 435 whales.
The coefficient of variation around this estimate (0.23) again was rather large and it is likely that the apparent increase in the abundance estimate for the stock between 1999 and 2000 was the result of interannual variation in the survey results, rather than growth in the population.
This is borne out by the results of the 2001 surveys.
For 2001, the National Marine Fisheries Service estimates the stock to number 386 whales (CV = 0.087).
The range of estimates within the 95 percent confidence interval is 325 to 459 whales.
Stock Assessment Under the Marine Mammal Protection Act, the National Marine Fisheries Service is required to prepare a stock assessment for each marine mammal stock under its jurisdiction that occurs in U.S. waters.
Among other things, each assessment is to include an estimate of the stock's potential biological removal level.
This calculation is based on the stock's estimated minimum population size, its maximum net productivity rate, and a recovery factor ranging from 0.1 to 1.0, depending on the status of the stock.
The potential biological removal level is the maximum number of animals, not including natural mortalities, MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2001 that can be removed from the stock while providing reasonable assurance that it will recover to or remain within its optimum sustainable population level.
The potential biological removal level calculated for the Cook Inlet population of beluga whales in the 1998 stock assessment, which used a recovery factor of 1.0, was 14 animals.
As discussed in previous annual reports, the Alaska Regional Scientific Review Group, appointed by the Service to provide advice on the status of Alaska marine mammal stocks, met in late 1998 to evaluate information on the Cook Inlet beluga whale stock.
The group recommended that the Service, in calculating the potential biological removal level for this stock, use a recovery factor of 0.5 to reflect its depleted status.
The group met again in April 1999 to evaluate information concerning the Cook Inlet beluga whale population and concluded that it should be considered a "high risk" stock because of its low abundance, declining trend, limited range, and susceptibility to catastrophic events.
As a result of that review, the Alaska Regional Scientific Review Group recommended that the National Marine Fisheries Service use a recovery factor of 0.1 when calculating the potential biological removal level for this stock.
Despite this advice, the 1999 stock assessment report for Cook Inlet beluga whales used a recovery factor of 0.5.
This resulted in a revised potential biological removal level of 2.7 whales per year.
The Service, in the 2000 stock assessment report, again did not adopt the 0.1 recovery factor recommended by the Scientific Review Group.
Rather, inasmuch as the Service had proposed to designate the Cook Inlet beluga whale population as depleted under the Marine Mammal Protection Act and was considering petitions for listing the stock as endangered under the Endangered Species Act, the Service lowered the recovery factor to 0.3.
This value was halfway between the 0.1 recovery factor generally used for endangered species and the factor of 0.5 associated with depleted and threatened stocks.
Using this value and the minimum population estimate of 303 for 1999, the Service calculated a potential biological removal level of 1.8 whales for this stock.
In its draft stock assessment for 2001, the Service again used the 0.3 recovery factor.
Using the minimum population estimate of 360 derived from the 2000 surveys, the Service proposed a revised potential 56 biological removal level for this stock of 2.2 whales per year.
Other changes in the draft 2001 assessment reflected the 2000 survey data, new analyses of the distribution of the stock, updated mortality estimates, a description of the provisions limiting subsistence taking, designation of the stock as depleted, and the Service's finding that listing the stock as endangered was not warranted.
Native Subsistence Harvest Section 101(b) of the Marine Mammal Protection Act allows Alaska Natives to take marine mammals for subsistence purposes or for making and selling handicrafts provided that the taking is not done in a wasteful manner.
Only if a stock has been determined to be depleted or has been listed as endangered or threatened may any other limits be placed on such taking.
The estimated subsistence harvest of Cook Inlet beluga whales averaged about 15 animals per year between 1990 and 1994, according to figures derived from a variety of sources and provided by the Alaska Beluga Whale Committee, a group made up of Alaska Native beluga whale hunters and biologists.
It is believed, however, that this figure underestimates the take because it does not take into account all animals that were struck and lost and may not include beluga whales taken from the Cook Inlet stock by Native hunters who reside outside the Cook Inlet region.
The Cook Inlet Marine Mammal Council, a Native group formed in 1992, estimated that more than 30 whales were taken annually by subsistence hunters in Cook Inlet from 1990 through 1994.
The most thorough surveys of beluga whale subsistence harvests in Cook Inlet were undertaken in 1995 and 1996 by the Cook Inlet Marine Mammal Council.
The Council reported that 72 whales were taken in 1995, including 22 that were struck and lost.
The kill in 1996 was estimated to be 98 to 147 whales, including an estimated 49 to 98 whales struck and lost.
In 1997, 70 whales were estimated to have been taken, of which an estimated 35 were struck and lost.
The National Marine Fisheries Service estimates that 42 whales were taken in 1998 although other information, including an unverified report of 20 whales taken during one weekend in June by hunters from outside the Cook Inlet region, suggests that the actual number may have been much larger.
Taking at these Chapter III Species of Special Concern unsustainable levels resulted in about a 50 percent reduction in Cook Inlet beluga whale numbers during the 1990s.
The imprecision of the estimates of subsistence taking during much of the 1990s prompted the Commission and others to recommend that the National Marine Fisheries Service adopt marking and tagging regulations, as provided for by section 109(i) of the Marine Mammal Protection Act.
In response, the Service promulgated such regulations in 1999, requiring Alaska Native hunters to report each Cook Inlet beluga whale landed and to present the lower left jawbone of the whale for marking.
Since establishment of the reporting and marking requirements, however, there has only been one reported landing of a beluga whale.
Part of the impetus for the increased number of beluga whales being taken was the development of commercial outlets for beluga whale muktuk (a popular Native food composed of the skin and blubber of the whale) in Anchorage.
Such sales arguably are allowed under the provision of section 101(b) of the Marine Mammal Protection Act that allows edible portions of marine mammals taken by Alaska Natives for subsistence purposes or for the creation of authentic Native handicrafts to be sold in Native villages and towns.
Under the National Marine Fisheries Service's interpretation of the Marine Mammal Protection Act, Anchorage is considered to be a Native village.
Because of the demand for muktuk, beluga whales taken near Anchorage had a significant cash value.
Before 1999, some hunters reportedly took large numbers of beluga whales for the muktuk, which they sold privately or at Native food stores in Anchorage.
The overharvest and precipitous decline of the Cook Inlet beluga whale has led to a number of actions to prevent further decline and to bring about the eventual recovery of the stock.
At first, action was limited to a decision by some hunters to refrain voluntarily from taking whales.
Subsequently, a freestanding legislative provision was enacted as part of the 1999 Emergency Supplemental Appropriations Act, Public Law 106-31, that prohibited, until 1 October 2000, the taking of a beluga whale from the Cook Inlet stock unless authorized by a cooperative agreement between the National Marine Fisheries Service and an Alaska Native organization.
It was believed that allowing the Service to limit the taking of Cook Inlet 57 beluga whales for a 16-month period would provide sufficient time for the agency either (1) to conclude a comprehensive co-management agreement with Native hunters or (2) to list the stock as endangered or threatened under the Endangered Species Act or as depleted under the Marine Mammal Protection Act and complete a rulemaking to restrict the hunt.
When it became apparent that such limitations could not be established quickly enough to provide the needed protection to the stock, Congress passed a revised provision in December 2000.
That provision, enacted as section 627 of Public Law 106-522, extended indefinitely the prohibition on hunting Cook Inlet beluga whales unless authorized by the National Marine Fisheries Service through a cooperative agreement.
Also, as discussed below, the Service issued a proposed rule in October 2000 to establish regulations under the Marine Mammal Protection Act to limit taking by Alaska Natives
.That rulemaking is pending.
As a result of these actions, no beluga whales were reported to have been taken during the 1999 season.
Although the Service entered into a cooperative agreement with the Cook Inlet Marine Mammal Council to allocate one strike to the Native Village of Tyonek for 2000, no whale was struck during the year.
In June 2001, the Service again entered into a cooperative agreement with the Cook Inlet Marine Mammal Council authorizing one strike to Tyonek.
This time the hunt proved successful, with the single strike resulting in the landing of a whale on 21 July 2001.
No other taking of a Cook Inlet beluga whale was reported during 2001.
Stock Status Concern over the small and decreasing number of beluga whales in Cook Inlet and the apparent overharvesting of the stock prompted the Service to publish in the 19 November 1998 Federal Register a notice of intent to review the status of Cook Inlet beluga whales.
The purpose of the review was to determine whether the Cook Inlet stock warranted designation as depleted under the Marine Mammal Protection Act or listing as endangered or threatened under the Endangered Species Act.
The review was also intended to elicit information on the stock's distribution, abundance, population dynamics, food habits, and health, as well as the effects of the Native MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2001 subsistence harvest and other anthropogenic impacts on the population.
As discussed in previous annual reports, the Commission provided comments to the Service on 22 January 1999.
The Commission noted that the unsustainable harvest by Alaska Natives was a major factor in the decline of the population and further noted that the preferred approach for addressing the overharvest should be a cooperative one in which the Native community and the Service shared responsibility for conserving the Cook Inlet beluga whale population.
The Commission recommended that the Service also pursue other alternatives, should it prove impossible to implement an enforceable co-management regime that would effectively limit the number of Cook Inlet beluga whales that could be taken.
These included adoption of regulations to restrict the harvest or enactment of legislation to impose such limits.
In light of the drastic decline of the population and the continuing threat of overharvest, the Commission believed that the population warranted protection under the Endangered Species Act and recommended that the Service use emergency procedures to list the stock as endangered or threatened.
The Commission further recommended that the Service initiate a rulemaking under section 10(e) of the Endangered Species Act and/or section 101(b) of the Marine Mammal Protection Act to limit the allowable Native take from the Cook Inlet beluga whale population.
Depletion under the Marine Mammal Protection Act As part of its status review of the Cook Inlet beluga whale, the National Marine Fisheries Service held a workshop in March 1999.
The review confirmed that Cook Inlet beluga whales are geographically and genetically isolated from other beluga whale stocks; that the stock's abundance had declined by nearly 50 percent between 1994 and 1998; and that the potential biological removal level established for this stock should be no more than three whales.
The Service provided a draft report based on results of the scientific review to the Commission in early July 1999, seeking the Commission's concurrence that designation of the stock as depleted under the Marine Mammal Protection Act was warranted.
The Commission responded by letter of 23 July 1999, recommending that the Service promptly complete and publish a proposed rule under section 115(a) of the Marine Mammal Protection Act to designate the Cook 58 Inlet beluga whale population as depleted or, alternatively, publish a proposed rule to list the population as threatened or endangered under the Endangered Species Act.
The Service chose the first alternative and, on 19 October 1999, published a proposed rule to designate the Cook Inlet beluga whale stock as depleted.
As recommended by the Commission and the vast majority of those that commented on the proposed rule, the National Marine Fisheries Service published a final rule in the Federal Register on 31 May 2000 designating the Cook Inlet stock of beluga whales as depleted.
A more detailed discussion of the basis for this finding may be found in the Commission's previous annual report.
Action under the Endangered Species Act As noted above, the Commission, beginning in January 1999, had recommended that the Cook Inlet beluga whale stock be listed as endangered or threatened under the Endangered Species Act.
This issue was subsequently raised in two petitions seeking to have the stock listed as endangered that were submitted to the National Marine Fisheries Service in March 1999.
On 9 April 1999 the Service published a notice announcing their receipt along with a finding that each of the petitions presented substantial information indicating that listing may be warranted.
Under the Endangered Species Act, the Service has 12 months in which to make a finding as to whether listing is warranted or not.
When the Service failed to meet that deadline, one of the groups of petitioners filed suit in U.S. district court (Cook Inlet Beluga Whale et al. v. Daley), seeking to compel issuance of the required finding.
The Service published a notice of determination on 22 June 2000, finding that listing under the Endangered Species Act was not warranted at that time.
The Service reviewed possible threats to the population, including fishery interactions, oil spills and contact with other pollutants and contaminants, killer whale predation, disturbance from oil and gas exploration and development, shipping, airport operations, other human activities, and prey depletion, and concluded that, with the exception of taking by subsistence hunters, none of these factors was likely having an adverse impact on the stock.
As for subsistence hunting, the Service concluded that the problem was being addressed sufficiently by limitations imposed by Public Law 106-31 and by regulations that the Service planned to propose pursuant to the Chapter III Species of Special Concern depletion designation under the Marine Mammal Protection Act.
Thus, it believed that the stock was no longer in danger of extinction or likely to become so in the foreseeable future.
As for the possible threat posed by the population having been reduced to a small size, an analysis of large whale population dynamics prepared by Service scientists concluded that a stock with at least 300 individuals and a positive intrinsic growth rate was unlikely to go extinct due to stochastic events.
Dissatisfied with the Service's reasoning, the plaintiffs in the aforementioned lawsuit amended their complaint in September 2000 to challenge the Service's decision not to proceed with a listing proposal.
They contended that the Service had acted arbitrarily and capriciously in finding that listing was not warranted and that it had failed to use the best available scientific and commercial data in making its decision, as required under the Endangered Species Act.
In response to that challenge, the City of Anchorage, the Kenai Peninsula Borough, the Matanuska-Susitna Borough, the Alaska Oil and Gas Association, and the Resource Development Council for Alaska moved to intervene in the case, claiming that their interests would be adversely affected if the Service's decision not to list the Cook Inlet stock of beluga whales were set aside.
Those motions were granted and, on 16 July 2001, the district court heard oral argument in the case.
The court issued its ruling on 20 August 2001, finding that the Service had acted within its discretion in declining to list the Cook Inlet beluga whale under the Endangered Species Act.
The court found that, although the Service had used small population size to support other listing decisions, this factor alone did not necessarily warrant a listing.
In this regard, the court believed that the plaintiffs had failed to carry their burden of showing that the existing population is not sustainable if the harvest is successfully restricted and had not adequately rebutted the Service's study that examined the effects of stochastic events on small populations of whales and its conclusion that extinction was unlikely.
Although the court found the plaintiffs' concern that enforcement might not be effective in controlling illegal takings to be reasonable, it found adequate support in the record for the Service's conclusions that future takings would be minimal and that the current population is sustainable.
59 The plaintiffs filed a notice of appeal in the case on 18 October 2001.
They are seeking review of the district court's decision that listing the Cook Inlet beluga whale under the Endangered Species Act is not warranted and of that court's order to strike extrarecord materials that the plaintiffs believe undermined the basis for the Service's determination.
As of the end of 2001, a briefing schedule in the case had not been set.
Regulation of Native Harvest Section 101(b) of the Marine Mammal Protection Act provides authority for the Service to regulate the taking of depleted species of marine mammals by Alaska Natives when necessary for the conservation of the affected species or stock.
Such regulations, however, may only be prescribed through formal rulemaking, which affords affected Natives and other interested parties the opportunity for a hearing on the record, through which an administrative law judge develops the record of the proceeding and subsequently provides a recommended decision to the agency.
Section 103(d) of the Act sets forth the rulemaking procedures and the information that must be published by the agency prior to, or concurrent with, the publication of a proposed rule.
Among other things, the agency is to publish and make available to the public any recommendations provided to the Service by the Marine Mammal Commission that relate to the regulations.
The Commission provided such recommendations by letter of 31 July 2000.
In general, the Commission strongly supported the proposal to establish harvest limitations, concluding that such an action was essential to conserve the depleted beluga whale stock.
The Commission believed, however, that certain aspects of the draft rule provided by the Service needed to be strengthened or clarified.
Among other things, the Commission suggested that the Service specify the particulars of the harvest regime more completely, rather than deferring most elements until the adoption of a cooperative agreement after regulations were in place.
The Commission further recommended that the Service consider revising a proposed prohibition on the sale of parts and edible portions from Cook Inlet beluga whales to prohibit other quasi-commercial transactions, such as barter, and address the sale of meat from other beluga whale stocks, which, if not also regulated, could MARINE MAMMAL COMMISSION Annual Report for 2001 create enforcement difficulties.
The Commission also cautioned that any strike limit established under the regulations could be revised only by formal rulemaking, suggesting that a more flexible approach than that under review by the Service might be preferable.
Proposed Rule After considering the Commission's comments and advice, the Service published a proposed rule on 4 October 2000.
At about the same time, the Service issued a draft environmental impact statement reviewing federal actions associated with the management and recovery of Cook Inlet beluga whales.
The preferred alternative identified in the statement was the issuance of regulations to establish an annual strike limit of two beluga whales until the Cook Inlet stock is no longer depleted.
This alternative was reflected in the proposed rule.
The Service believed that allowing two strikes per year would meet the dual objectives of providing an opportunity for a traditional subsistence harvest while not significantly delaying the recovery of the stock.
The Service estimated that a take of two whales per year would enable the stock to recover to the lower bound of its optimum sustainable population range within 25 years, as compared with a recovery time of 22 years under a no-harvest scenario.
Despite the advice it had received from the Commission, the proposed rule indicated that the Service believed that the proposed strike limit could be adjusted periodically, if necessary, without undergoing formal rulemaking procedures.
As with the earlier draft provided to the Commission for comment, the proposed rule would have deferred several specifics of the harvest to be worked out through co-management agreements between the Service and Native hunters.
Formal Hearing As discussed in greater detail in the previous annual report, the Commission filed a notice on 1 November indicating its intent to participate as a party in the formal rulemaking hearing.
That notice ind
